 We have four-month-old mice that were diabetic and now are not diabetic.
 The study is still in its infancy, as cautioned by Ehud Ur, professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and director of the Canadian Diabetes Association's clinical and scientific Department.
 Like other experts, he is sceptical about the possibility of curing diabetes, pointing out that these results are not relevant for people who are already affected by type 1 diabetes.
 The Secretary of the Swedish Academy, Sara Danius, announced publicly on Sveriges Radio that the Academy had given up trying to contact Bob Dylan,
 Danius has disclosed, I have telephoned and sent Email to his closest collaborator, who has replied in a very kind manner. For the moment, that's it.
 In previous, Jamie Siminoff, Ceo of Ring, has stressed that the company was born when it still couldn't hear the Bell from its garage shop.
 He said he built a Wi-Fi Bell.
 Siminoff has declared that sales are increased after his appearance in 2013 in an episode of Shark Tank, in which the jury of the program refused to finance the startup.
 Siminoff appeared on the television shopping channel QVC at the end of 2017.
 Ring has also reached a transactive agreement with the company's competing security services company, the ADT Corporation.
 On the one hand, it seems that there is an experimental vaccine in place to reduce mortality from Ebola, on the other hand, no drug has yet been found that is clearly demonstrated to be suitable for the treatment of the existing infection.
 A cocktail of antibodies, ZMapp, initially showed promise in the field, but formal studies have revealed an efficacy lower than that hoped for in preventing deaths.
 In the PALM study, ZMapp was used as a control, meaning scientists used it as a reference and compared it to the other three therapies.
 USA Gymnastics supports the letter from the United States Olympic Committee and recognizes the absolute necessity for the Olympic community to work to create a safe environment for all of its athletes.
 We agree with the USOC that the interests of our athletes and our clubs, and their sport, can be better served by bringing about meaningful change within our organization, and not by decertification.
 USA Gymnastics has launched an independent investigation to understand how it is possible that an abuse of the size described with such courage by those who have managed to survive Larry Nassar could have been hidden for so long, and is willing to implement any necessary or appropriate change.
 USA Gymnastics and the U.S. Olympic Committee have the same goal: to make gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible so that athletes can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and accountable environment.
 In the course of the nineteen sixty s, Brzezinski was the counselor of John F . Kennedy and later of the Lyndon B . Johnson administration.
 In the course of the 1976 elections, he advised Carter in foreign policy, then serving as National Security Advisor from 1977 to 1981, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 As a member of the NSA, he collaborated with Carter on diplomatic affairs, including the Camp David Accords of 1978, the normalization of U.S. relations with China in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution (which led to the Iran hostage crisis in Iran in 1979), and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, has collected nominations in all the main categories.
 Gosling and Stone had the nomination: best actor and best actress respectively.
 Other nominations include best film, best direction, best photography, best costumes, best editing, best original score, best set design, best sound editing, best sound mixing and best original screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, Audition (The Fools Who Dream) and City of Stars, were nominated for best original song.
 In the evening of Sunday, the President of the United States, Donald Trump, provided a statement through his spokesperson, in which he announced the withdrawal of American troops from Syria.
 The announcement was made following a telephone call between Trump and Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey, the statement said, would also take over the custody of ISIS fighters who, on the refusal of European nations, have not been repatriated.
 This not only confirms that some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory already widely diffused, but provides greater details than the fossils, such as color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 According to scientists, the plumage of this animal was Brownish in the upper part, with a pale or carotenoid coloration in the lower part.
 The discovery also allows for detailed information about the evolution of bird feathers.
 Since the dinosaur's feathering does not have the basic structure, the so-called rachis, but instead has other characteristics typical of feathers, barbs and barbules, the researchers concluded that the rachis is probably the result of an evolutionary development subsequent to these characteristics.
 The structure of the feathers makes one think that it was not used for flight, but rather for regulating the temperature or for courtship.
 Second, according to the researchers, although the tail belonged to a young dinosaur, the specimen reveals a plumage of an adult, not that of a chick.
 A car bomb exploded yesterday morning at the headquarters of the police in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two officers and wounding over twenty people.
 The hospital has followed protocol for infection control, including separating the patient from others to prevent possible infection of others.
 The police have reported that the suspect responsible for the attack is a Daesh militant.
 They found that the sun's operation is based on the same basic principles as all the other stars in the solar system: the activity of all the stars in the solar system is determined by nothing other than their luminosity and rotation.
 Luminosity is used together with rotation to define the Rossby number of a star, which is linked to the plasma flow.
 The lower the Rossby number, the less active the star is compared to magnetic inversions.
 During his trip, Iwasaki has found himself in trouble on several occasions.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped marriage in Nepal, and was arrested in India.
 The standard 802.11n can operate in both the 2.4Ghz and 5.0Ghz bands.
 If the base station has dual radios, this will allow it to be backward compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g.
 The 802.11n speeds are considerably higher than those of previous versions, with a theoretical maximum throughput of 600 Mbps.
 Duvall, married with two adult children, did not arouse a great deal of interest in Miller, to whom he told the story.
 At the request of a comment, Miller replied, Mike talks a lot during the hearing . I was preparing for which I did not listen to what he said.
 We will strive to cut carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by a notable margin by 2020, compared to the levels of 2005, Hu said.
 It has not set a precise value of the reduction, stating that it will depend on Chinese economic productivity.
 Hu has invited developing countries to avoid the old road of polluting first and cleaning up later.
 It has also added that they should not, however, be forced to assume obligations that transcend their development phase, nor their responsibilities and competences.
 The Iraq study group presented its report today at 12.00 GMT.
 Ammon says, no one can guarantee that any action in Iraq at this moment will stop the sectarian wars, the growing violence or a slide towards chaos.
 The report begins with an appeal for an open debate and consensus in the United States about the policy in the Middle East.
 The report is strongly critical of almost every aspect of the current policy of the executive towards Iraq and urges an immediate change of direction.
 The first of its 78 recommendations calls for the initiation of a new diplomatic initiative to be undertaken by the end of this year with the aim of protecting Iraq's borders from hostile actions and to resume diplomatic relations with its neighbours.
 Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, Argentina's first lady and current Senator, announced her presidential candidacy yesterday evening in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers from Buenos Aires.
 Kirchner chose the Teatro Argentino to announce her intention to run for the Presidency, the same place from which in 2005 she had launched her campaign for the Senate as a member of the delegation of the province of Buenos Aires.
 The discussion was sparked by controversy over spending for aid and reconstruction following Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives, joking, have labeled as the Bush New Deal for New Orleans.
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction effort focused on the assignment of reconstruction contracts to insiders in Washington, D C.
 Over four million people traveled to Rome to take part in the funeral.
 The people present were so numerous that it was not possible for all to have access to the funeral in St . Peter's square.
 In various points of Rome, large television screens were installed to allow people to watch the ceremony.
 Similar installations have been set up in many other Italian cities and around the world, especially in Poland, and a large number of people watched the event through them.
 Historians criticize the FBI's past policies, arguing that it concentrated resources on easy cases, in particular car thefts, in order to increase the agency's success rate.
 The initiative against obscenities was funded by Congress starting in fiscal year 2005, with the specific request to the FBI to assign 10 agents to adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa has scored the highest individual score of the innings with 70 runs in just 41 balls, scoring 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, medium order batsmen, played well and scored in collaboration one hundred runs.
 Then the captain lost his wicket, and from that moment until the end of the innings India made only 36 runs, losing 7 wickets.
 The morning of November 16, President George W. Bush arrived in Singapore and began his one-week stay in Asia.
 To welcome him, there were the vice Prime Minister of Singapore, Wong Kan Seng, and the Prime Minister of Singapore, Lee Hsien Loong, with whom he discussed commercial and terrorism-related issues.
 After a week of midterm election setbacks, Bush held a speech on the development of trade in Asia.
 After a 25-minute meeting Tuesday with NDP leader Jack Layton in the PMO, Prime Minister Stephen Harper said he agreed to put the government's Clean Air Act before a committee of all parties in preparation for the second reading.
 In the course of the meeting with the Prime Minister, Layton had requested some amendments to the Conservative Party's environmental bill, urging a complete and thorough rewrite.
 Since the Federal Government intervened to fund the Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the state government and several MPs have criticised the measure as a pre-election stunt ahead of the Federal election in November.
 Prime Minister John Howard has, however, declared that the aim of the gesture, thanks to an extra donation of 45 million Australian dollars, was only to protect the hospital's structures from downgrading by the Tasmanian government.
 Second to the last bulletin, readings of the sea level have signaled the generation of a tsunami near Pago Pago and Niue.
 No damage to things or people was reported in Tonga, however, power was temporarily lost and this, as reported, did not allow the Tongan authorities to receive the tsunami warning from the PTWC.
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii near the coasts were closed for the entire day Wednesday, despite the all-clear.
 The announcement was welcomed by President George W . Bush.
 Gordon Johndroe, a spokesman for Bush, called the North Korean promise a "fundamental step toward the denuclearization of the Korean peninsula.
 Today, in the Atlantic ocean, the tenth storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, Subtropical Cyclone Jerry, formed.
 According to the National Hurricane Center, Jerry at this point does not constitute a threat to the mainland.
 According to the U S . Army Corps of Engineers, six inches of rain could break the damaged levees that were damaged in the past.
 The Ninth Ward, where Hurricane Katrina had caused flooding as high as 20 feet, at this moment is almost completely submerged as the water has surpassed the nearby levee.
 Water is spilling over a 100-foot section of the levee.
 The administrator of Commons Adam Cuerden has expressed his disapproval of the cancellations during his chat with Wikinews last month.
 Wales said, in substance, that he had lied to us from the beginning, firstly by behaving as if it were for legal reasons, and secondly by pretending to listen to us until the moment of actually cancelling the works.
 Following the discomfort of the community, efforts were made to redraft a policy regarding sexual content on the site, which hosts millions of openly licensed multimedia content.
 The activity performed was mostly theoretical, but the program was written to simulate the surveys of the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The team's goal was to see if the effect sought by the team could be caused by the tidal forces between the dark matter in this Galaxy and the dark matter in the Milky Way.
 As the moon exerts a force of attraction on the earth that generates the tides, so the Milky Way exerts a force on the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 Scientists have been able to deduce that the effects of dark matter on other dark matter are the same effects that normal matter has.
 This theory holds that much of the dark matter around a Galaxy is collected into a sort of halo, formed of a multitude of small particles.
 Television reports show the white smoke that emerges from the plant.
 Local authorities are warning people living near the power plant to stay indoors, turn off air conditioners, and not to drink tap water.
 According to the Japanese nuclear agency, radioactive cesium and iodine were detected at the plant.
 The hypothesis of the authorities is that this indicates a break and a consequent loss of uranium fuel containers at the site.
 Dr Tony Moll has identified extensively drug resistant tuberculosis (XDR-TB) in the South African province of KwaZulu-Natal.
 According to a statement released in an interview, this new variant was highly concerning and alarming, due to the elevated mortality rate.
 Second, according to Dr . Moll, some patients may have contracted the microbe inside the hospital, and at least two of them were health care workers at the hospital itself.
 In a year, a person infected can arrive to contagious from 10 to 15 close contacts.
 Nevertheless, the percentage of XDR-TB in the entire group of people affected by tuberculosis appears still low, at 6,000 out of a total of 330,000 people infected at any one time in South Africa.
 The collision between the satellites, both weighing over 1,000 pounds and traveling at about 17,500 miles per hour, occurred at 491 miles from the earth.
 Scientists say the collision caused an impoiant explosion.
 They're still trying to determine the size of the crash and what consequences it will have on earth.
 The U S . Strategic Command of the U S . Department of Defense is tracking the debris.
 The result of the tracing analysis will be published on a public Website.
 The authorities in Ohio report that a doctor who worked at the children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, will be charged with aggravated homicide after the discovery of his mother's body in the trunk of her car on Wednesday.
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in Ohio, in Blue Ash, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, lying on the street in her underwear, apparently under the influence of drugs.
 He directed the agents toward his old black Oldsmobile Intrigue that was 500 feet away.
 There, wrapped in blood-stained blankets, was found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53.
 According to police, the body seemed to have been there for a day or so.
 The first cases of the season were reported at the end of July.
 Pigs are carriers of the disease, which is then transmitted to humans via mosquito bites.
 The Indian government, spurred on by the epidemic, has adopted some measures like deploying people to capture pigs in the most affected areas, distributing thousands of mosquito nets and spraying pesticides.
 The government has also promised several million vaccine doses against encephalitis, to make sure that next year health facilities are not unprepared.
 Inequalities in the delivery of vaccines this year have been delayed because of a lack of funds and because they have been given a low priority level compared to other diseases.
 Three years after his transfer to Sweden in 1956, Słania began working for the Swedish Postal Service, becoming its chief engraver.
 He has created more than 1,000 stamps, both for Sweden and for 28 other countries.
 The quality and detail of his work are so recognized that his is one of the very few names familiar to philatelists, some of whom have specialized in collecting only his work.
 In 2000, it obtained its thousandth stamp, the magnificent David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl's "Great Deeds by Swedish Kings", which is listed in the Guinness Book of Records.
 His work also consisted in engraving the banknotes of many countries, including the portraits of the Prime Minister on the front side of the new Canadian 5 and 100 dollar bills.
 Gibson, after the incident, was rushed to the hospital, but died shortly after.
 The truck driver, who is 64, came out unharmed from the crash.
 The vehicle involved was removed from the scene of the incident the same day, around 12:00 GMT.
 A person who worked in a garage near the scene of the accident said, quote, there were kids waiting to cross the street, all crying out in tears.
 They all returned from the place where the accident had taken place.
 Other items on the agenda in Bali include saving the world's last forests and sharing technologies to support the growth of developing nations in less polluting ways.
 The UN also hopes to create a fund to help countries hit by global warming to cope with its impacts.
 Money could be used to build houses that are resistant to flooding, to improve water management and to diversify crops.
 Fluke wrote that efforts by some to discourage women from speaking openly about women's health have not succeeded.
 It has arrived at this conclusion thanks to the multitude of positive and encouraging comments received from both men and women pushing for the recognition of contraceptive drugs as a medical necessity.
 At the end of the fighting, once the wounded had been transported to the hospital, about 40 of the remaining detainees remained in the square, refusing to return to their cells.
 The negotiators have tried to resolve the situation, but the demands of the inmates are unclear.
 Between 22:00 and 23:00 MDT the inmates set fire to the courtyard.
 Soon after, agents in riot gear entered the courtyard and cornered the inmates using tear gas.
 The firefighters eventually managed to put out the fire at 23:35.
 Following the construction of the dam in 1963, the seasonal flooding that spread sediments along the course of the river ceased.
 This sediment was fundamental in the creation of both beaches and sand banks that became habitat for wildlife.
 Two species of fish have become extinct and two others are at risk of extinction, including the Cavedano Gobbo.
 Even if the flooding only raises the water level by a few metres, authorities hope it will be enough to restore the eroded sandbanks further downstream.
 No tsunami warning has been issued and according to the Jakarta geophysics agency, no warning will be issued since the quake did not reach the magnitude of 6.5.
 Despite there being no tsunami risk, residents began to panic, abandoning activities and homes.
 Despite Winfrey's tearful goodbye, she assured her fans that she would be back.
 This will not be a goodbye, this is a chapter that ends and a new one that begins.
 The final results of the presidential and parliamentary elections in Namibia saw the re-election of the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, who won a significant advantage.
 The SWAPO party remains in power, with a majority in the National Assembly.
 The coalition and Afghan troops have reached the area to secure the site, then support from other coalition aircraft has arrived.
 The accident happened in high mountain and is believed to have been caused by enemy fire.
 The search efforts for the site of the accident find themselves on their way through bad weather and accidental terrain.
 The medical charity Medecins Sans Frontieres and the World Health Organisation say this is the worst outbreak recorded in the country.
 The spokesman for Medecins Sans Frontieres, Richard Veerman, said, quote, Angola is about to go through the worst epidemic ever and the situation in this country remains very grave.
 Today at 10:00 the weather was magnificent when the matches began and, despite a shower lasting very little, it was a perfect day for Rugby Sevens.
 South Africa, the first seed of the tournament, started with a bang, winning easily against Zambia, the fifth seed.
 Despite looking rather rusty in the match against the sisters of the South, South Africa has nonetheless steadily improved its performance throughout the tournament.
 They distinguished themselves with disciplined defense, the ability to handle the ball, and excellent teamwork. It was clear that they were the team to beat.
 The tree, according to officials of the city of Amsterdam and the museum of Anna Frank, is infested with a fungus and constitutes a public health hazard because, they say, it was imminently at risk of falling.
 It was due to be demolished on Tuesday, but it was saved by an urgent decision of the tribunal.
 The entrances to the caves, called the Seven Sisters, all have a diameter of at least 100 to 250 meters.
 Infrared images show thermal oscillations between day and night, demonstrating that they are probably caves.
 During the day they are colder than the surface around them, and at night they are warmer.
 Glen Cushing, of the U S . Geological Survey and Northern Arizona University in Flagstaff, Arizona, said,
 In France, voting is traditionally a low-tech experience: voters enter an isolated booth and put in a sealed envelope a pre-printed slip of paper indicating their chosen candidate.
 After verification of his identity by the officials, the voter deposits the ballot in the urn and signs the register of voters.
 The French electoral law codifies the procedures in a rather rigorous way.
 Since 1988, the ballot boxes must be transparent so that voters and observers can testify that at the beginning of the voting no ballot boxes are present and that no other boxes are inserted other than those of the voters, duly counted and authorized.
 Candidates may send representatives to assist in every phase of the process. In the evening, volunteers count the votes under strict control, in accordance with specific procedures.
 The Eee PC of ASUS, previously launched worldwide for aspects related to saving and functionality, has become a controversial topic at the IT Month of Taipei 2007.
 But the consumer market for laptops will be significantly modified and different after the Taiwan Sustainable Award was given to ASUS by the Yuan executive of the Republic of China in 2007.
 The station's Website defines the program as, quote, old-fashioned radio theater with a new and disrespectful Geek twist.
 Initially, the show was only broadcast on the historic TogiNet Radio Online, specializing in radio talk shows.
 TogiNet has established AstroNet Radio as a sister station at the end of 2015.
 The show originally used non-professional voice actors from East Texas.
 Diffused raids would continue during the night, given the absence of law enforcement agents on the streets of Biškek.
 According to one witness, Biškek was sinking into a state of anarchy, with bands of people roaming the streets to loot shops of consumer goods.
 Various residents of Biškek have criticized the protesters in the south for illegal actions.
 South Africa won against the All Blacks in the Rugby Tri Nations match played at home at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg.
 The final score deemed the winner by one point (21 to 20), interrupting the series of 15 consecutive victories of the All Blacks.
 For the Springboks this was the conclusion of a run of five consecutive defeats.
 This was the last game for the All Blacks, who two weeks before had already won the cup.
 The final match of the tournament, which will see the Springboks take on Australia, is scheduled to take place next week at Ellis Park in Johannesburg.
 Monday a light earthquake hit Western Montana at 22:08.
 The United States Geological Survey and its National Earthquake Information Center have not received any immediate reports of damage.
 The epicenter of the earthquake was located about 20 km (15 miles) north-north east of Dillon and about 65 km (40 miles) south of Butte.
 It has been confirmed that the avian influenza H5N1, lethal to humans, has contaminated a wild duck found dead Monday in the eastern part of France in a swamp near Lyon.
 France is the seventh European country, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy, to be hit by the virus.
 Cases suspected of H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark have not yet been confirmed.
 Chambers had sued God for, quote, having sown death, destruction and terror among millions and millions of inhabitants of the earth.
 Second, Chambers, an agnostic, said his lawsuit was superficial and anyone could be sued by anyone.
 Camille Saint-Saens presented a story at the French opera about an artist whose life revolved around the love of drugs and Japan.
 This means that during the show the actors smoke pipes and urge the audience to join them.
 They get, respectively, the fourth, the fifth and the sixth place Newt Gingrich, former Speaker of the House, Rick Perry, governor of Texas, and Michele Bachmann, a congresswoman.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum but dispensed harsh words for Romney, for whom negative ads against Gingrich were aired in Iowa.
 Perry has declared, I will return to Texas to verify the results of tonight's vote and see if there is a path for me to continue in this race.
 Bachmann, who in August won the straw poll in Iowa, has decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was transferred to Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he later died.
 Stando a quanto riferito had about 20 years. Bieber has declared,
 According to TMZ, the photographer stopped his vehicle from the opposite side of Sepulveda Boulevard and tried to photograph the officer directing traffic at a stop, then crossed the street and proceeded, forcing the California Highway Patrol officer who was directing traffic at a stop to turn around twice.
 Second, the police say it's unlikely the driver of the car that hit the photographer will face any criminal charges.
 With only eighteen medals available each day, a good number of countries failed to make it onto the podium.
 Among these, the Netherlands with Anna Jochemsen placed ninth in the women's Super-G yesterday, and Finland with Katja Saarinen placed tenth in the same class.
 Australian Mitchell Gourley obtained the eleventh place in the men's Super-G, while Czech rival Oldrich Jelinek obtained the sixteenth place in the same speciality.
 The Mexican Arly Velasquez finished in the fifteenth place in the men's Super-G, while the New Zealander Adam Hall finished ninth in the men's Super-G.
 Polish blind skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished thirteenth in the Super-G. South Korean Jong Seork Park finished twenty fourth in the men's Super-G.
 The UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake are believed to have brought the disease, which started in the soldiers' camp.
 Second, the inadequate sanitation of the United Nations camp caused bacterial contamination of the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's main rivers.
 Before the arrival of troops, Haiti's problems related to the disease dated back to the 1800s.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy cited independent studies that the disease was unknowingly introduced to Haiti by Nepalese International peacekeeping forces of the United Nations.
 Danielle Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease, has said the outbreak may have been caused by the peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that the patient had been taken to Howard University hospital in stable condition.
 The patient had traveled to Nigeria, where some cases of Ebola virus have been reported.
 The hospital followed the protocol for infection control, including isolating the patient to avoid others from becoming infected.
 Before The Simpsons, Simon had worked on various programs in different roles.
 In the eighty s, he collaborated on programs like Taxi, Cheers and the Tracey Ullman show.
 In 1989, he participated in the creation of The Simpsons alongside Brooks and Groening and oversaw the selection of the show's first team of writers.
 Although Winfrey was tearful in her farewell, she made it clear to her fans she will be back.
 In a first moment the Chinese press agency Xinhua had reported the hijacking of a plane.
 Second reports received later said the plane had received a bomb threat and was diverted to Kandahar, Afghanistan, to land.
 The first reports affirm that the aircraft was diverted again towards Afghanistan after it was denied emergency landing in Ürümqi.
 Air accidents are common in Iran, whose fleet is now obsolete and poorly maintained, both from a civilian and a military point of view.
 International sanctions meant that they could not buy new aircraft.
 At the beginning of this week, three people were killed and three others injured following an incident involving a police helicopter.
 Last month Iran experienced the worst air disaster in years when a plane heading to Armenia crashed, killing all 168 passengers on board.
 The same month saw another airliner crash in Mashad, killing seventeen people.
 The subsequent concerts of the tour were canceled by Aerosmith.
 The Sarenne rock group had to leave for a tour in the United States and Canada that was to last until September 16.
 The band canceled the tour after lead vocalist Steven Tyler injured himself following a fall from the stage during a performance on August 5.
 Murray lost the first set in a tie-break after the players had maintained each their service in the set.
 Del Potro had an early advantage in the second set, also ending with a tie-break after the score of 6-6.
 At this point, Del Potro was subjected to a treatment to his shoulder but managed to return to play.
 The start of the program was at 20:30 local time (15:00 UTC).
 Some famous singers from all over the country offered bhajan, or devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The singer Sanju Sharma opened the show, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary. Lakkha Singh, accompanied by the singer Raju Khandelwal, also presented the Bhajan Chhappan Bhog.
 Lakkha Singh then took the initiative and began to sing the bhajan.
 They served Baba Shyam 108 Chhappan Bhog (for Hindu religion, 56 edible products including sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes, etc. offered to the deity).
 Lakkha Singh also presented the bhajan for the chhappan bhog. He was accompanied by the singer Raju Khandelwal.
 At the Tokyo Game Show presentation on Thursday, Satoru Iwata, president of Nintendo, revealed the design of the new Nintendo Revolution Controller.
 In a way similar to the TV remote control, through two sensors located next to the user's television, the Controller is able to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements inside the game by moving the device in the air.
 Shortly after the start, Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and ended his race.
 Fernando Alonso, his teammate, was in the lead for most of the race, but his race ended shortly after his pit stop, probably because of the incorrect mounting of the right front wheel.
 Michael Schumacher reached the finish line at the back of Alonso, due to a damage to the suspension that occurred in one of the duels in which he was involved during the race.
 Based on a transcript of the press conference, he reportedly said, quote, she's very gracious and she sings pretty well.
 Every time we've done the tests, I've felt moved to the depths of my heart.
 After about 3 minutes from launch, a camera on board showed various fragments of insulating foam breaking away from the fuel tank.
 It was initially hospitalized at the James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 N . Wayne Hale Jr, director of the NASA Space Shuttle program, said the foam had fallen after the moment that concerned them.
 Five minutes after the show began, the wind started, about a minute later, the wind was reaching 70 km/h, then came the rain, so violent and torrential it stung your skin like a needle, then the hail started, people in panic, screaming and running, overturning themselves.
 I lost my sister and her friend, while I was moving I had two disabled people in wheelchairs in front of me and people jumping on them and pushing them.
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant, which is located in Niigata Prefecture, was regularly operating.
 The Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported no damage due to the earthquake, and also reported that reactors 1 and 2 at the Shika nuclear power plant were shut down.
 According to reports, about 9,400 homes in the area are without water and about 100 are without electricity.
 Some roads are damaged, the railway network has been interrupted in the areas involved and the airport of Noto, in the province of Ishikawa, remains closed.
 Outside the office of the governor general, a bomb exploded.
 In two hours, three more bombs exploded in the vicinity of government buildings.
 According to some reports, the official number of victims is eight, and official reports confirm that there were up to 30 injured, although the final numbers are not yet known.
 In household samples of urine from deceased persons who had eaten contaminated pet food, traces of both cyanuric acid and melamine were found.
 The researchers at the University have said that the two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can hinder kidney function.
 Researchers have found in the urine of cats the formation of crystals, due to the addition of melamine and cyanuric acid.
 In comparison via infrared spectroscopy, the composition of these crystals corresponds to that found in the urine of companion animals that are affected.
 I do not know if you are aware of this or not, but a large part of the goods coming from Central America entered our country duty free.
 Nevertheless, 80% of our goods were taxed with duties in the countries of Central America.
 All this did not seem to make sense to me, certainly it was not right.
 All that I say to the people is treat us as we treat you.
 Arnold Schwarzenegger, the governor of California, has signed a law banning the sale or rental of violent video games to minors.
 The bill would require that violent video games sold in the state of California be labeled with a warning that reads, quote,
 This morning the director of public prosecutions, Kier Starmer QC, released a statement saying that both Huhne and Pryce will be charged.
 Huhne has resigned and will be replaced in government by Ed Davey MP, with Norman Lamb MP expected to take over the role of Minister for Business, Energy and Industrial Strategy.
 The appearance of Huhne and Pryce at Westminster magistrates' court is scheduled for February 16.
 The victims were Nicholas Alden, 25, and the driver, Zachary Cuddeback, 21.
 Edgar Veguilla has reported injuries to his arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider will have to undergo facial reconstruction surgery.
 Uka's weapon did not explode when it was pointed at the head of a fifth man, Schneider has constant pain, is blind in one eye, has a section of his skull missing and his face has been reconstructed in titanium.
 Schneider testified via Video-Conference from a U S . Air Force base in his home country.
 In addition to Wednesday's event, Carpanedo participated in two single races of the Championships.
 The first in slalom, where at the first run she made a DNF. Another 36 competitors out of 116 in the same race did not finish the run.
 The other race she participated in, the giant slalom, saw her finish tenth in the women's category, with a combined time of 4:41.30, more than 2:11.60 minutes slower than the first-placed Austrian Claudia Loesch, and more than 1:09.02 minutes slower than the Hungarian Gyöngyi Dani, who finished ninth.
 Four skiers in the women's group failed to finish their runs, and 45 of the 117 participants in the giant slalom failed to finish the race.
 The police of Madhya Pradesh managed to recover the laptop and the cell phone that had been stolen.
 The vice inspector general, DK Arya, announced, quote, we have arrested five persons for the rape of the Swiss woman. We have also found her cell phone and her laptop.
 The names of the accused are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 According to the superintendent of police, Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the accused appeared in court with their faces covered.
 None of the three people in the house at the time of the car crash was injured.
 Despite this, the driver was seriously injured to the head.
 The road in which the accident happened was temporarily closed, while the emergency services freed the driver from the Audi TT red.
 He was initially taken to the James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Since that moment, Adekoya has been at the Edinburgh sheriff court charged with the murder of his own son.
 She is held in custody pending trial and process, but any testimony given by an eyewitness could be tainted, since her image has been widely publicized.
 This is a common practice in other parts of the UK, but Scottish justice has other parameters. Scottish courts have in fact ruled that the publication of the photos was potentially prejudicial.
 Second, according to Pamela Ferguson, a professor at the University of Dundee,
 The Crown Office, which has overall responsibility for prosecutions, said it would not be making any further comment at least until the formal charge was made.
 According to leaked documents, the dispute over borders, which Palestine wants to be based on the borders existing before the 1967 Middle East war,
 Stando a that which is said, the other themes addressed include the future status of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both nations, and the question of the Jordan Valley.
 Once the agreement was signed, Israel demanded a constant military presence in the valley, while the Palestinian Authority agreed to abandon such presence only for five years.
 First, most riders wear riding boots with a heel and a smooth, quite narrow, sole.
 In the framework of the Sporting Shooters Association program, the NPWS in collaboration with the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia (NSW) Inc, has recruited qualified volunteers.
 According to Mick O'Flynn, acting director of Park Conservation and Heritage of the NPWS, the four shooters chosen for the first operation were given extensive training and safety instructions.
 Yesterday, Martelly swore in a new Provisional Electoral Council (CEP) composed of nine members.
 This is the fifth provisional electoral Council of Martelly in four years.
 Last month a presidential commission proposed a package of measures aimed at pushing the country towards new elections, including the resignation of the previous CEP.
 The Commission constituted Martelly's response to the widespread protests, which began in October, that challenged the regime.
 Occasionally violent protests have been sparked by the failure to hold elections, some of which were scheduled as early as 2011.
 There have been about 60 cases of malfunctioning iPods that have caused a total of six fires and caused minor burns to four people.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) has said it is aware of 27 incidents linked to the devices.
 Last week, the Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) announced that it had been informed by Apple of another 34 incidents, which the company defined as being “non-serious”.
 In its response, the Ministry called the report's delay by Apple, quote, absolutely deplorable.
 The earthquake in the Marianas was felt at 07:19 local time (21:19 GMT on Friday).
 According to the Northern Marianas Islands Emergency Management Office, no damage was reported in the nation.
 And furthermore, the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center reported that there were no signs of a tsunami in progress.
 In Manila, the capital of the Philippines, a former Filipino policeman took hostage Hong Kong tourists after hijacking their bus.
 With his M16 Rolando Mendoza fired on the tourists.
 Many of the hostages have been saved, at least six are dead.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were released immediately along with the Filipino photographers.
 The photographers then replaced an elderly woman who needed to use the bathroom. Mendoza was struck dead.
 Liggins has followed in his father's footsteps and has taken up a career in medicine.
 After following training in obstetrics, in 1959 she entered work at the National Women's Hospital in Auckland.
 While serving at the hospital, in his spare time Liggins began to study cases of premature labour.
 His research showed that the administration of a hormone would accelerate the maturation of the lungs in the foetus.
 Xinhua reported that government investigators Wednesday recovered two black boxes with flight recordings.
 Even his wrestling companions wanted to pay tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer has stated, "Luna was the first Queen of the East. My first manager. She died in the night of the two moons. Alone, exactly like her. A strong woman.
 Luna was as crazy as me . She was, perhaps, even more crazy . I loved her and will miss her . I hope she's in a better place . Dustin Runnels.
 Secondly, the Howard University hospital survey conducted on 1,400 people before the 2010 Federal Election showed that people opposed to Australia becoming a Republic had increased by 8% since 2008.
 In the course of the 2010 Federal election campaign, the then Prime Minister Julia Gillard stated that she believed Australia should become a Republic at the end of the reign of Elizabeth II.
 This opinion is shared by 34% of respondents, according to whom Queen Elizabeth II should be the last monarch of Australia.
 At the opposite end of the survey, 29% of respondents support Australia becoming a Republic as soon as possible, while 31% are of the opinion that it should never become one.
 The Olympic gold medalist was supposed to compete in the 100 and 200 meter freestyle and three relay events at the Commonwealth games, but she has accused several disorders that have induced to doubt her physical form.
 He could not take the necessary painkillers to overcome the pain because they are banned from the Games.
 On January 25, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and professor of computer science at the University of Missouri-Central, discovered the largest prime number ever known up to that day.
 The discovery was verified by several people through the use of various hardware and software at the beginning of February, and was announced Tuesday.
 Comets could have been one of the sources that led water and organic matter, or the stuff that can form proteins and support life, to earth.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form and in particular how the earth formed, as it collided with comets a very long time ago.
 Cuomo, 53, has been in office since the beginning of this year as governor, and last month he signed a law that makes same-sex marriage legal.
 Second, he said, speculations are nothing but chatter and political idiocy.
 He is rumored to be considering a run for the Presidency in 2016.
 Second, the FAA says NextGen will allow planes to cover shorter routes and save millions of gallons of fuel each year, reducing carbon dioxide emissions.
 The system employs satellite technology rather than the obsolete ground-based radar to allow air traffic controllers to locate aircraft with greater precision and to provide pilots with more accurate information.
 No supplementary transport is being set up and surface trains will not stop at Wembley, while there are no car parks or interchange parking available on site.
 Fears linked to the absence of transportation have emerged the possibility of having to play the match obligatorily behind closed doors, without the support of the team's fans.
 According to a study published Thursday in the Journal Science, a new species of bird has been born on the Galapagos Islands in Ecuador.
 Second, according to researchers at Princeton University, USA, and Uppsala University, Sweden, the new species evolved in just two generations, although it was thought that the time necessary for this process was much longer, this effected by mating between a Darwin finch endemic to Darwin, Geospiza fortes, and the cactus finch immigrant, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can be worked in any type of form. It can be rolled into tiny forms.
 It can be pulled until it forms a thin thread, suitable for being twisted and intertwined, it can be hammered or rolled into sheets.
 It can be made very thin and attached to other metals, sometimes it was used to decorate the images painted by hand in the books called miniature codices, just because it could be made so thin.
 Using the juice of the red cabbage it is possible to construct a pH indicator.
 The juice of the cabbage changes color based on how acid or alkaline the chemical element is.
 The level of pH of the chemical analysed is given by the amount of hydrogen ions present (the letter H of pH).
 Ions of hydrogen are protons to which electrons have been stripped away (since hydrogen atoms are formed by a proton and an electron).
 Mix together the two dried powders and then, with clean and wet hands, roll them into a ball.
 Between the moisture present on your hands and the outer layers, a reaction will take place that will cause a strange sensation and form a sort of shell.
 Almost all the houses in the cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had a bathroom with running water connected to an advanced sewage system.
 In Greece, in the Minoan cities of Crete and Santorini, remains of sewage networks have been discovered.
 In the ancient world, cabinets existed in Egypt, Persia and China, and in the Roman civilization were sometimes inserted in public baths, frequented by a mixed public of men and women.
 To call someone miles away, a satellite is used.
 The satellite in space receives the signal and then sends it back almost instantly.
 The satellite was launched into space with a rocket, and scientists use space telescopes because the atmosphere of the earth distorts light and vision.
 To transport a satellite or telescope into space, a rocket must be more than 100 feet tall.
 The wheel has enormously changed the world. Among the various advantages it has offered us, the most important consists in having provided us with simpler and faster transportation.
 Thanks to his invention, the train, the automobile and several other means of transportation have made their appearance.
 Below them are other medium-sized cats that feed on medium-sized prey, ranging from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Finally, there are many small felids, including domestic cats, that feed on small prey, notably insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The concept of niche constitutes the secret of their success, a particular goal that each felines have and that allows them not to compete with others.
 Lions are the most social of cats and live in large groups called prides.
 The branches are composed of adult males, usually 2 or 3 related to each other, and a number of females and cubs that can reach up to 30.
 Usually females are closely related to each other, being a large family of daughters and sisters.
 The lion's behaviour is very similar to that of the Wolf or dog, whose behaviour is in fact surprisingly analogous to that of the lion, even as regards the mortal attacks on their prey.
 A complete athlete: the tiger is able to climb, swim, jump very long distances, and exert a pulling force five times that of a strong man.
 The tiger belongs to the same family (the genus Panthera) as the lion, the leopard and the jaguar.
 The tiger's roar is not as powerful as the lion's, but it more resembles a phrase of words shouted and rabble-rousing.
 Ocelots love to eat small animals, and if possible, they go after monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds, and almost all the prey they catch are much smaller than they are.
 Scientists believe that ocelots follow and find their prey by smelling the ground where they have been.
 Thanks to their night vision, they are able to see very well in the dark, and are able to move furtively to hunt their prey.
 When a small group of living beings (a small population) separates itself from the main population to which it belongs (for example, if it moves over a mountain range or a river, or moves to a new island, making it difficult for it to return), it will probably find itself in a different environment from the one in which it was before.
 This new environment is characterized by different resources and competitors, so in order to position itself as a strong competitor, the new population will need different characteristics or transformations than those necessary in the past.
 The original population has not changed at all, and continues to need the same adaptations as before.
 With time and as the new population adapts to its new environment, it looks less and less like the other population.
 At a certain point, after thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will appear so different from each other that they cannot be defined as belonging to the same species.
 This process, which consists in the formation of new species, is called speciation, and speciation is an inevitable consequence and a fundamental element of evolution.
 Plants produce oxygen that is breathed by humans and absorb the carbon dioxide expelled by humans through breathing.
 Plants elaborate their own nutriment with the sun through photosynthesis, and they also make shade.
 We build our houses from plants and we produce our clothes from plants. Most of the food we eat is made from plants. Without plants, animals could not survive.
 The mosasaur was the super predator of its era and for this reason it feared nothing, except other mosasaurs.
 From its long jaws more than 70 teeth, sharper than razors, more than a further row situated on the palate, therefore for anyone who crossed its path there was no escape.
 We do not know for certain, but it is possible that it had a bifurcated tongue, its diet comprised turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and it is possible that it was a cannibal.
 He attacked anything that entered the water, even a giant dinosaur like the T-Rex could not compete with him.
 Although most of their foods would appear familiar to us, Roman banquets also included several strange or unusual dishes, such as wild boar, peacock, snails, and a rodent called the ghiro.
 Another difference was that while the poor and women ate sitting on chairs, the rich men loved to banquet together, lying on one side while they consumed their meal.
 Naturally, the foods of ancient Romans did not include many foods that arrived in Europe centuries later from America or Asia.
 For example, they did not have corn, tomatoes, potatoes or cacao, and none of the ancient Romans had ever tasted a turkey.
 Babylonians built a temple for each deity, which was considered the deity's home.
 People brought sacrifices to the gods, and priests tried to provide for the needs of the deities through ceremonies and festivals.
 Every temple had an open courtyard and then a sanctuary inside accessible only to priests.
 Sometimes, they were constructed in the form of a pyramid, called a ziggurat, which became part of the temples.
 The summit of the tower was a sanctuary dedicated to the god.
 Thanks to the mild climate that characterizes the Middle East, the house was not of fundamental importance.
 Part of the life of the Jewish family took place outdoors.
 Women cooked in the courtyard, while shops were simple stalls that faced the street. Stone was used to build houses.
 In the land of Canaan there were no great forests, so wood was particularly expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely populated in the Norse Sagas, it was said to have been named by Erik the Red after he had encountered Greenland on his voyage after being exiled from Iceland for murder.
 But, regardless of his discovery, at that time the Eskimo tribes were already living there.
 Although all were Scandinavian, the peoples, Kings, customs, and history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland were very different.
 If you've seen the movie, the Da Vinci code, you might think that the Declaration of Independence has a map of the treasure on the back.
 However, this is false. Even though something is written on the back of the document, it is not a map of the treasure.
 On the back of the Declaration of Independence, the original Declaration of Independence,
 Though it is not known for certain who wrote it, it is known that at the beginning of its existence the large document of parchment (measuring 29.75 inches by 24.5 inches) was rolled up to be stored.
 Probably, then, the annotation was only put on as a label.
 Though many of the animals in the park are used to seeing humans, the wildlife is nonetheless wild and should not be fed or disturbed.
 It was governed by the Vichy regime, or those Frenchmen who in 1940 had made peace with the Germans and were allied with the invaders, instead of fighting them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded Southern France, this offensive operation took the name of Dragoon.
 American and French forces had liberated the south of France in just two weeks and were heading towards Germany.
 Civilization is a specific culture, shared by a significantly large group of people who live and work in a collaborative manner, forming a society.
 The word civilization derives from the Latin civilis, which means civil, and is in turn connected with civis, or citizen, and civitas, or city or city-state, and in some ways defines also the dimensions of society.
 The city-states are the first realities to anticipate the idea of nation. Culture of the civilization means transmitting knowledge through more generations, leaving an imprint culturally indeleble through a diffusion equitable.
 Minor cultures often disappear without leaving any historical trace, not being recognized as true civilizations.
 During the war of independence, the thirteen states formed for the first time a weak central government, and the Congress was its only member, under the Articles of Confederation.
 The Congress had no power to impose taxes, and, given the absence of an executive or judiciary at the national level, relied on state authorities, often little cooperative, to enforce its acts.
 He had no authority to bypass tax laws and tariffs between states.
 To modify articles required the unanimous consent of all the states, and these, for their part, had so little consideration for the central government that their representatives were often absent.
 Together with Germany, the Italian national football team is the second most successful football team in the world, having won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, hockey on ice, hockey on track and Formula 1 car racing are among the most popular sports.
 Winter sports are more widely practiced in the northern regions and see Italians compete in international events and Olympic events.
 Japan is made up of almost 7,000 Islands, the largest of which is Honshu, and this makes Japan the seventh largest archipelago in the world.
 From a geographic point of view, Japan is referred to as an archipelago, considering the presence of groups of Islands that compose it.
 Taiwan was born in the fifteenth century when European sailors who transited by there soon registered the name of the island with the name of Ilha Formosa, or the Island of Mercy.
 The Dutch East India company in 1624 established a base in the southwest part of Taiwan, beginning a transformation that affected the systems of cereal production of the aborigines and assuming Chinese laborers to work in its rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, the Western and Northern coastal areas of Taiwan fell under the control of the Qing dynasty forces (1644-1912); in 1885, Taiwan was declared a province of the Qing Empire.
 After being defeated in the first Sino-Japanese war (1894-1895), the Qing government signed the Shimonoseki Treaty in 1895, ceding sovereignty of Taiwan to Japan.
 Machu Picchu comprises three primary structures, and namely the Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun, and the Temple of the Three Windows.
 Most of the peripheral buildings have been rebuilt to give tourists a more precise idea of their original appearance.
 In 1976, 30% of Machu Picchu had been recovered, but restoration work is still ongoing.
 The most common format in the world for still photography, for example, is 35 mm, the same as the most used film on the end of the analogue era.
 It still produces today and, more importantly, its aspect ratio is inherited from the sizes of Digital camera image sensors.
 Strangely, the height of the 35 mm format is 24 mm and its width is 36 mm.
 The proportions of this format (dividing by twelve to obtain the simplest ratio of integers) are therefore considered to be 3:2.
 The proportions of many of the formed families (for example, the family of formats APS) are equal or very close to this value.
 The much-abused and often derided rule of thirds is a simple guideline that creates dynamism while maintaining a measure of order within an image.
 Second, according to this rule, the most effective place to position the main subject corresponds to the intersection of the lines that divide the image into thirds, both vertically and horizontally.
 In this phase of European history, the Catholic Church, having become rich and powerful, found itself under scrutiny.
 Christianity had acted as a glue between the European States for over a thousand years, despite linguistic and cultural differences.
 His all-present power influenced everyone, from the King to the common citizen.
 One of the foundations of Christianity is that wealth is there to serve to alleviate suffering and that the church's monetary reserves exist precisely for this reason.
 The central authority of the church remained in Rome for over a thousand years, and this convergence of power and money has prompted many to ask whether this principle was respected.
 Soon after the beginning of hostilities, Britain decided to enact a naval blockade of Germany.
 The strategy proved effective: it involved the interruption of any military and civilian supply, despite this block violating international law, usually acceded to and codified by multiple international treaties of the last two centuries.
 Britain mined international waters to prevent access to entire sections of the ocean, putting even neutral ships at risk.
 Since this tactic had sparked a limited response, Germany expected a similar response to its indiscriminate U-Boat warfare campaign.
 In the 20s, the prevailing attitudes of most citizens and nations were pacifism and isolation.
 After witnessing the horrors and atrocities of World War I, nations desired to avoid a similar situation in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla accepted a job offer from the Edison company in New York City, and this led him to transfer to the United States.
 He arrived in the United States with 4 cents in his pocket, a book of poems, and a letter of recommendation written by Charles Batchelor, his former boss, to Thomas Edison.
 In ancient China, the different periods of time were indicated in a very singular way: every period of China or every family that was in power constituted a specific dynasty.
 Even the intervals between the individual dynasties were characterized by periods of instability and division between the provinces, the most notable being the so-called period of the Three Kingdoms, between the Han dynasty and the Jin dynasty, which lasted for 60 years.
 In these periods, between many nobles in lotta for the throne, there were fierce wars.
 The period of the Three Kingdoms was one of the most violent eras in the history of ancient China, with thousands of people dying in the struggle to win a place of honor in the imposing Palace of Xi'An.
 The social and political effects are numerous, among these can be cited the use of the metric system, the passage from absolutism to the Republic, nationalism, and the conviction that the nation belongs to the people and not to a single sovereign.
 After the Revolution, professions were open to all candidates, men, allowing the most ambitious and fortunate to succeed.
 The same goes for the military, since the Army's rankings, instead of being based on class, are now based on caliber.
 The French Revolution was a source of inspiration for many other oppressed workers of various countries to start their own revolution.
 Muhammad was deeply interested in questions that went beyond the life of this world. He used to go to a cave known as Hira on the mountain of the Noor,
 The cave, which has survived the passing of time, offers in itself a very clear image of Muhammad's spirituality.
 The cave is on the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca, completely detached from the rest of the world.
 In reality, it's not at all simple to find, even if one knows its existence, once inside the cave, the isolation is total.
 There is nothing to be seen but a wonderful clear sky and a great quantity of mountains around.
 Among the seven wonders of the world, the great pyramid of Giza is the only one that has arrived to our days not in a state of ruin.
 Built by the Egyptians in the third century BC, the great pyramid is one of the great pyramid-shaped structures built in honor of a dead pharaoh.
 The plain of Giza, or the Necropolis of Giza, in the Valley of the Kings in Egypt, is home to numerous pyramids,
 The important pyramid was created in honor of the Pharaoh Cheops, and many of the smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to honor the Pharaoh's wives and family members.
 The indication arcata in su looks like a V and the indication arcata in giù looks like a graffetta or a square missing its bottom side.
 Toward the high end means that you should start from the tip and push the bow, and toward the low end means that you should start from the alamaro, which is where the hand supports the bow, and pull the bow toward you.
 An ascending bow usually generates a softer sound, while with a descending bow a sound is produced that is more strong and decided.
 You can decide to add your personalized indications with pencil, but keep in mind that the signs of the archeggio that you find printed have a musical value, so in line of mass they should be respected.
 On October 6, 1789, a crowd of women from the market forced King Louis XVI, in a panic, to leave Versailles and return to Paris, along with his wife, Marie Antoinette, their two young children, Marie Therese, age 11, and Louis Charles, age 4, and his sister, Elizabeth.
 With a carriage they returned to Paris, surrounded by a crowd of people who shouted and yelled threats against the sovereigns.
 The crowd forced the King and the Queen to keep their carriage windows wide open.
 At a certain point, someone in the crowd showed the terrified queen the head of a Royal guard who had been killed at Versailles.
 The costs of the U S . imperialism to conquer the Philippines were paid by the Filipinos themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the colonial regime of the United States to cover good part of the expenses and the interest on the obligations oscillated in name of the Philippine government through the banking institutions of Wall Street.
 Clearly, the enormous profits derived from the prolonged exploitation of the Filipino people constituted the profits at the base of U S . imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, we need to know the context that led to the creation of this order.
 The era in which the events took place is commonly called the high Middle Ages, the period of European history that covers the eleventh, twelfth and thirteenth centuries (from the year 1000 to 1300 C.E.).
 The high Middle Ages were preceded by the early Middle Ages and followed by the late Middle Ages, which conventionally ends around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term that includes in practice a wide range of ideas, from technological innovation or technological imperative to the narrow sense in which the destiny of man is moved by a logically underlying, associated with scientific laws and their realization in technology.
 Part of the general idea of technological determinism is that the development of technology itself follows a path that goes well beyond political and cultural influence, and the other part of the idea is that technology has intrinsic effects on societies, rather than being conditioned socially.
 For example, we can say that the automobile necessitates the development of the road network.
 However, a national road network for only a few cars is not economically sustainable, so new methods of production are being developed to reduce the costs associated with owning a car.
 The possession of mass automobiles also leads to a greater percentage of accidents on the roads, and consequently the invention of new techniques of care for injured people.
 Romanticism was characterized by a consistent component of cultural determinism, traced to authors like Goethe, Fichte, and Schlegel.
 In the framework of romanticism, geography has conditioned individuals, and over time, usages, customs and culture have arisen that, being in harmony with the context of society, have resulted more effective than laws imposed in an arbitrary manner.
 Analogously to Paris, nowadays known as the capital of the world's contemporary fashion, Constantinople was the capital of fashion in feudal Europe.
 Its notoriety as a center of luxury began around the 400s and lasted until about the 1100s.
 During the twelfth century, its prestige diminished, especially because the crusaders returned bringing gifts like silk and spices, which were valued more than what the Byzantine markets offered.
 It was at this point that the title of fashion capital passed from Constantinople to Paris.
 The highest point of the Gothic style was touched in the period between the X and the XI century and in the XIV century.
 Initially, clothing suffered the strong influence of Byzantine culture of the East.
 But the slowness of communication ways makes it so that the diffusion of styles in the West can be delayed by 25-30 years.
 Towards the end of the Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style. One of the most significant developments of the era, a result of the Crusades, was the introduction of buttons to fasten clothes.
 Agriculture is defined as subsistence when it is practiced for the sole purpose of producing the sufficient to satisfy the food needs of the farmer and his family.
 Sustainable agriculture is a simple system, usually biological, that uses seeds originally from the ecological region in association with crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques aimed at getting the maximum from the harvest.
 Historically, most farmers practiced subsistence agriculture, and in many developing countries, it is still so.
 Subcultures unite individuals with the same opinions, who do not feel represented by the standards of society, allowing them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures distinguish themselves based on age, ethnicity, class, social position and or sex of its members.
 The characteristics that define a subculture can be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Often members of a subculture indicate their membership through a peculiar and symbolic use of style, which includes modes, manners, and slang.
 One of the most commonly used methods to explain the importance of socialization is to analyze some unfortunate cases of children who, through neglect, following misfortunes, or through the effect of intentional abuse, have grown up without a correct socialization with adults.
 These children are called feral or wild. Some of them have been segregated by people, often their own parents, in some cases the rejection is motivated by the refusal of a severe intellectual or physical handicap by the parents.
 Feral children may have suffered severe violence or trauma before abandonment or flight.
 Other children may have been raised by animals, others still seem to have lived alone in the wild nature.
 When a feral child is totally raised by non-human animals, it shows behaviors (within physical limits) almost entirely analogous to those of the particular animal that has taken care of him, such as fear or indifference towards humans.
 Learning based on projects should make learning itself simpler and more interesting, while scaffolding goes a bit beyond that.
 Scaffolding is not a mode of learning, but more of an aid to those who are undertaking a new learning experience, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 The scaffolding can be both virtual and real. In other words, a teacher is an example of scaffolding, but so is the little assistant in Microsoft office.
 Virtual scaffolds are integrated into the software and have the purpose of interrogating, soliciting and explaining procedures that the student may have had difficulty handling on their own.
 Children are given up for adoption for various reasons ranging from abandonment to abuse, if not even extortion.
 A child should never grow up in an environment that does not guarantee nutrition, care and formation, but to them it happens.
 We believe that foster care represents a safe zone for these children.
 Our foster care system should provide safe homes, loving foster parents, stable education and reliable health care.
 It is supposed that foster care makes up for all the needs not met in the home from which they were removed.
 Internet brings together some elements of both mass communication and interpersonal communication.
 The characteristic elements of the Internet bring about supplementary dimensions in terms of the theory of uses and gratifications.
 For example, as important motivations for using the Internet, James et al. (1995) suggested learning and socialization.
 Eighmey and McCord's study of public reactions to web sites identified two new aspects of motivation, namely, personal involvement and continuing relationships.
 The use of Video-Recording has allowed significant discoveries in the interpretation of Micro-Expressions, which are facial movements lasting only a few milliseconds.
 In specific, it is claimed that it is possible to discover if a person is lying by interpreting micro expressions in a correct way.
 In his essay, the President, Oliver Sacks illustrated how people incapable of understanding spoken language because of brain damage are nevertheless able to assess with precision the sincerity of others.
 He even argues that such abilities in interpreting human behaviour can be shared with animals, such as domestic dogs.
 In the twentieth century research has demonstrated the existence of two pools of genetic variability, namely hidden and expressed variability.
 With mutation, a new genetic variability is added, with selection, it is eliminated from the pool of expressed variability.
 Generation after generation, segregation and recombination redistribute the variability back and forth between the two pools.
 For a primate with an analogous digestive apparatus to that of humans, it is difficult to satisfy their amino acid needs with the available plant resources in the savanna.
 Furthermore, the lack of such activities has grave consequences: slow growth, malnutrition and, eventually, even death.
 The most easily accessible vegetable resources would have been the proteins present in leaves and legumes, but for primates like us they are difficult to digest, unless they are cooked.
 Animal foods, on the other hand, such as ants, termites, and eggs, are not only easy to digest, but provide a high quantity of proteins, containing all the essential amino acids.
 In light of all this, it should not be surprising that our own ancestors solved their own protein problem in a certain sense, just as chimpanzees do today.
 Interrupted sleep is the intentional process of waking that occurs during the normal sleep period, followed by a return to sleep (10 to 60 minutes later).
 This process can be easily put into practice using a relatively silent alarm clock to bring you to a state of consciousness, without waking you completely.
 If you decide to reset the clock in the sleep, you can put it on the other side of the room so you're forced to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other options centered on the biorhythm involve the consumption of many liquids before sleeping, especially water or tea, known for its diuretic properties, which forces one to get up to urinate.
 A person enjoys a peace of mind proportionately opposite to the tension existing in his body and spirit.
 Less tension, more positive is the vital force existing. Every one of us has the potential capacity to find absolute peace and contentment.
 All can reach enlightenment this goal is hindered only by our tension and our negativity.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but it has been enriched by the Mahayana path of love and various Indian yoga techniques.
 In Tibetan Buddhism, in line of mass, it's very simple, it's based on Kundalini Yoga, meditation, and a path of all-encompassing love.
 Kundalini Yoga activates the Kundalini energy through the use of yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantras and visualizations.
 The Deity Yoga is the fulcrum of Tibetan meditation, through the representation of various divinities, one cleanses the energetic channels, activates the chakras and develops the consciousness of enlightenment.
 Germany was a common enemy in World War II, leading to collaboration between the USSR and the United States. With the end of the war, systemic, procedural and cultural conflicts led to the breakup between the two countries.
 Two years after the end of the war, the allies of the past had become enemies, and the cold war began.
 It would last for the next 40 years and would be fought for real, by mercenary armies, in the battlefields from Africa to Asia, in Afghanistan, in Cuba and many other countries.
 On September 17, 1939, the Polish defense had already been broken, the only option was to retreat and reorganize along the Romanian bridgehead.
 These plans proved obsolete, however, when more than 800,000 Soviet Red Army soldiers advanced and created the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts, after invading the Eastern regions of Poland, violating the Riga Peace Treaty, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other bilateral and multilateral treaties.
 Sailing ships are the most efficient way to move large volumes of people and goods across the oceans.
 The task of the marines has always been to guarantee to the country the safeguard of its capacity to move people and goods, while at the same time countering the same capacity of the enemies to move their people and their goods.
 One of the recent examples most worthy of note is represented by the battle of the Atlantic during World War II. During the battle, the Americans were trying to move men and merchandise across the Atlantic ocean to support Britain.
 At the same time, the German Navy, using mainly submarines, tried to disrupt this traffic.
 If the Allies had not succeeded, Germany probably would have had the chance to conquer Britain, as it had done in the rest of Europe.
 It seems that goats were first domesticated about 10,000 years ago on the Zagros mountains in Iran.
 They began to be raised by cultures and tribes of the antique world to have easily available milk, wool, meat, and skin.
 Domestic goats were usually raised in herds left free to move on hills or other grazing areas, often tended by caprai, or shepherds, who were often children or adolescents.
 Already in the sixteenth century in England, wagonways were constructed.
 Although formed simply of parallel wooden rails, the wagonway, if compared with the roads of the period, allowed the horses that traveled upon them to reach greater speeds and to carry heavier loads.
 Traverses were introduced relatively soon to maintain the rails in position, gradually, however, it was realized that the rails would be more efficient if they had a bar of iron on top.
 It became a common practice, although the iron caused a greater wear of the wooden wheels of the wagons.
 Finally, wooden wheels left the place to those in iron. In 1767, the first completely iron rails made their appearance.
 The first means of transportation that man has known are the legs. Humans began to walk upright two million years ago with the appearance of Homo Erectus, which means upright man.
 His predecessor, the Australopithecus, did not habitually walk upright.
 Signs of bipedal specialization are present in Australopithecus fossils dating to 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, although it is possible that Sahelanthropus walked upright as early as seven million years ago.
 To try to mitigate in some measure the future sufferings we can begin to adopt lifestyles more respectful of the environment, we can adhere to the environmentalist movement and also do activism.
 In many cases this only works as a Symptomatic treatment, if instead we want a permanent solution, we should find the ultimate cause of the problems and Disable it.
 It is quite evident that the world has changed a lot because of the scientific and technological progress of humanity, while the problems have increased because of the overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of human beings.
 After Congress adopted it on July 4, a manuscript draft signed by Congress President John Hancock and Secretary Charles Thomson was then sent to John Dunlap's printing shop a few blocks away.
 In the night, between 150 and 200 copies were produced, today known as the Dunlap broadsides.
 The document was read publicly for the first time on July 8 in the courtyard of Independence Hall and the charge was given to John Nixon.
 One was sent to George Washington on July 6, which he read to his troops stationed in New York on July 9, while a copy reached London on August 10.
 The 25 Dunlap broadsides are the oldest copies of the document that still exist.
 Second, many paleontologists today believe that a category of dinosaurs survived and is still alive today,
 Many tend to not consider them dinosaurs because of their feathers and their ability to fly.
 Yet birds have many characteristics that unite them with dinosaurs.
 Like the T-Rex, they are equipped with feet with scales and claws, lay eggs and walk on their hind legs.
 In the end, manipulation of information coded in the form of Binary numbers is at the heart of all computers used today.
 A Binary number can have only one of two values, either 0 or 1, and in the technical language of computers these numbers are called Binary digits or bits.
 The internal poisoning may not be immediately evident, and its symptoms, including vomiting, are very generic, making it impossible to make an immediate diagnosis.
 The main indication of internal poisoning could be the presence in the house of an open container of chemicals or noxious substances.
 Check the label to see if instructions for first aid are present for that specific poison.
 The term acaro is formally used by entomologists for this group of insects.
 The term comes from the familiarity in ancient times with bed bugs, insects that have strongly adapted to become parasites of man.
 Both the assassin and bed bugs are nidicolous, meaning they are adapted to live in the nest or home of their host.
 In the United States of America, multiple sclerosis (MS) accounts for about 400,000 known cases, ranking first among neurological diseases that affect young and middle-aged adults.
 MS is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which includes the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 Research has shown that the chances of developing MS in women are double that of men.
 A couple may decide that raising a child is not in their interest, or in the interest of their own child.
 These couples have the option of choosing an adoption plan for their child.
 In adoption, the natural parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 The primary goal of science is to understand the way the world works through the scientific method, which guides most scientific inquiry.
 But not only experimentation, since an experiment is a test that is used to exclude one or more of the possible hypotheses, even asking questions and making observations can help to orient scientific research.
 Naturalists and philosophers focused on classical texts, in particular, the Latin version of the Bible.
 Aristotle's opinions on the various subjects of knowledge, including psychology, were accepted.
 With the progressive decline of the Greek language, the West was isolated from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Many have observed that physiological rhythms and behavior depend in a determinant way on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production through biological clocks.
 There have been documented periodic rhythms, which are not only reactions to periodic external signals, relative to most living beings, including bacteria, fungi, plants, and animals.
 Biological clocks are independent oscillators, whose free cycle proceeds for a period of time even in the absence of external stimuli.
 One of the first experiments to suggest DNA was a genetic material was one conducted by Hershey and Chase.
 Hershey and Chase used bacteriophage, viruses, to implant their own DNA into a bacterium.
 They have performed two experiments evidencing the DNA of the bacteriophage with radioactive phosphorus or the protein of the bacteriophage with radioactive sulphur.
 Mutations can have a range of different effects based on the type of mutation, the relevance of the piece of genetic material involved and whether the cells affected belong to the germ line.
 Mutations that can be transmitted to children are only those at the level of germ cells, mutations that occur elsewhere can cause cell death or cancer.
 Natural tourism attracts people interested in visiting natural areas with the aim of enjoying the landscape, including flora and fauna.
 Examples of activities to do on the spot include hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, visits to parks and studying information regarding the ecosystem.
 For example, by visiting, photographing and learning about Borneo's orangutans.
 All morning, people leave the small country towns in their cars, crossing other people whose place of work is the place from which they have just left.
 In this dynamic back and forth, everyone is in some way connected to a system of transport based on private cars, which in turn support.
 Today science reveals that this massive carbon-based economy has forced the biosphere out of one of its conditions of stability that has allowed human evolution over the last two million years.
 Every person participates in social life and uses the transportation systems, of which almost everyone complains.
 In developed countries, it's rare to hear similar levels of complaint about the quality of water or bridges falling down.
 Why do transport systems attract so many complaints, why are they being rejected every day? are the engineers who design them incompetent, or are there more profound motivations?
 Traffic flow is the study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles from one point to another and the interactions that they generate with each other.
 Unfortunately, the study of traffic flow is complex, since the behaviour of drivers cannot be predicted with absolute certainty.
 Fortunately, the behavior of drivers tends to fall within a reasonably constant range, so in turn, traffic flows tend to show a reasonable consistency and can be represented generically in a mathematical way.
 To obtain a more accurate representation of the traffic flow, the three main variables were correlated: (1) portage, (2) density and (3) speed.
 These relationships are useful for planning, designing and managing road structures.
 Insects were the first animals to fly, and the ability to fly allowed them to escape enemies more easily and to find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects are advantageous in their ability to fold their wings along the body.
 This allows them to exploit a greater variety of small crevices to hide from predators.
 Among all the insects existing today, the only ones that cannot fold their wings are the dragonflies and the damselflies.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus claimed that the solar system moved around the sun.
 For some, it had reason, but many others believed the opposite, namely that the solar system, including the sun itself,
 In a partnership of NPWS and the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia (NSW) Inc, qualified volunteers were recruited, under the Sporting Shooters Association's hunting program.
 The Rio de Janeiro is the largest and second longest river on earth, transporting eight times the amount of water of the second largest river.
 The Rio de la Amazons is also the largest River in the world, with a width that in some places reaches six miles.
 Twenty percent of the water that flows from the planet's rivers into the oceans comes from the Amazon River.
 The main Amazon River is 6,387 kilometers long. It is the largest river in the world, with thousands of minor affluents.
 Stone pyramids continued to be built until the end of the Old Kingdom, but despite this, the pyramids of Giza were never surpassed in terms of greatness and technical excellence of their realization.
 The ancient New Kingdom Egyptians remained enchanted by the monuments of their ancestors, who at that time were over a thousand years old.
 The population of the Vatican city is about 800 inhabitants, making it the smallest independent state in the world and the one with the smallest population.
 The language of the Vatican City for legislation and official communications is Italian.
 Italian is also the everyday language spoken by most people who work inside the state, while Latin is often used in religious functions.
 In the Vatican City, all citizens are Roman Catholics.
 Man has begun to know the basic chemical elements like gold, silver and copper already in the antiquity: these elements can be discovered in nature in native form and it is possible to extract them in a fairly simple way with the help of primitive instruments.
 According to the philosopher Aristotle, everything is composed of a combination of one or more of the following four elements: earth, water, air, and fire.
 These in fact more closely resemble the four states of matter, namely, solid, liquid, gaseous, and plasma.
 Alloys are basically a mixture of two or more metals. Keep in mind that the periodic table contains numerous elements.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered metals, obviously, there are also metals like silver and gold.
 There may also be alloys composed of minute quantities of non-metallic elements, such as carbon.
 In the universe, everything is made of matter and all matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are incredibly tiny, so tiny that trillions of them could fit into the point at the end of this sentence.
 After its invention, the pencil has proven to be a good friend to many.
 Unfortunately, with the introduction of new writing methods, the pencil has been relegated to a lower status and lesser use.
 Today, everyone writes messages on the screens of computers and never has the need to approach a temperamatite.
 We can only wonder what fate the keyboard will have when something newer arrives.
 The principle that energy is needed to put together a nucleus with many protons and neutrons is at the heart of the fission bomb.
 In practice, it's like rolling a heavy cart up a hill, so by splitting the nucleus further, some of that energy is released.
 Some atoms present nuclei unstable, this means that they tend to break in presence of a push scarce or null.
 The surface of the moon is made up of rocks and dust, and its outer layer is called the crust.
 The crust has a thickness of about 70 km on the side nearest and 100 km on the side farthest.
 It is thinner under the seas and thicker under mountainous areas.
 I maria potrebbero essere più numerosi sul lato vicino because the crust is thinner, which has facilitated the rise of the lava in surface.
 Theories of content are focused on the search for what satisfies or attracts individuals.
 Second, these theories present people as having certain needs and or desires that have been internalized as they become adults.
 These theories analyze what it is that drives some people to want to do what they do, and what are the factors of the context in which they live that drive them to do or not do certain things.
 Among the theories on the contents most diffused there are Maslow's theory of the hierarchy of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory.
 In general, when managers start to manage their ex-colleagues, two behaviors can emerge. On the one hand, there are those who seek to remain one of the guys.
 The manager of this type finds it difficult to take unpopular decisions, to put in place disciplinary actions, to evaluate performance, to define and assign responsibility.
 At the extreme opposite, the manager transforms into a completely different person, who feels that he has to change the entire operation of the team and make it his own.
 At the end of the day, the leader is the person ultimately responsible for the team's success and failure.
 This attitude often generates dissent between leaders and the rest of the team.
 The standard of excellence of virtual teams is analogous to that of conventional teams, but with some small differences.
 Members of the virtual team often have the function of point of contact for their next physical group.
 Often they have greater autonomy than members of conventional teams, since matches can occur at various times, which may not be covered by the local management.
 The existence of a real and invisible team (Larson and LaFasto, 1989, p109) is also a fundamental element of a virtual team.
 This is especially popular with school leavers, allowing them to take a year out before university, without compromising their education.
 Why should an organization want to go through the long process of building a learning organization? A good reason for implementing the concepts of organizational learning can be innovation.
 When all the resources available in all the functional departments of an organization can be used effectively, creativity and ingenuity can emerge.
 Consequently, the path of collaboration within an organization to overcome an obstacle can lead to a new innovative process to meet the needs of the client.
 In order for an organization to be innovative, leaders must create a culture of innovation, as well as shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) illustrates the continuum theory as a method used to help organizations achieve higher levels of performance.
 Neurobiological results have demonstrated the physical existence of a theoretical approach to the investigation of cognition.
 The link between brain pathology and behaviour is at the heart of the scientists' research.
 It has long been known that some types of brain damage, trauma, injury and tumors can influence behavior and modify certain mental functions.
 The introduction of new technologies allows us to see and investigate structures and processes in the brain that have never been observed before.
 This offers us a great deal of information and material to create simulation models that help us understand our mental processes.
 Despite having a strong connotation of fantasy, IA represents a very important branch of computer science that deals with intelligent behavior, learning, and adaptation of machines.
 Research on AI includes the creation of machines to automate operations that require intelligent behavior.
 Some examples of application are control, planning and programming, the ability to respond to client's diagnosis and questions, as well as the recognition of writing, vocal and facial.
 These things have become distinct disciplines, focusing on providing solutions to real problems.
 The IA system is now often used in economics, medicine, engineering and military, in addition to being integrated in several software applications for home computers and video games.
 Trips represent a fundamental part of the teaching. Often teachers would like to take their students to places that are not possible to reach by bus.
 The solution is offered by technology with virtual tours, where students can see the artifacts of museums, visit an Aquarium or admire beautiful works of art while sitting in class.
 Sharing a virtual field trip is also a great excuse to share travel experiences and reflections with future classes.
 For example, every year the students of Bennet school in North Carolina design a Website about their trip to the capital, and the Website is redesigned every year, but the previous versions are kept Online and become an album.
 Blogs can also contribute to improving students' writing. Often, in fact, their first experiences with Blogs are marked by a grammar and an orthography that is less than curated, but in general the presence of an audience changes things.
 Since students are usually the most critical audience, to avoid negative judgments the author of the Blog commits to improving the writing.
 Blogs also force students to become more aware of the moment they are in,
 The Blog is a tool that aims to encourage collaboration and develop student learning beyond the normal school day.
 The correct use of Blogs can help students become more critical and Analytical, responding actively to Internet materials, students can define their own position within the writings of others, as well as delineate their own perspectives on specific issues.
 Ottawa is the bilingual and suggestive capital of Canada, rich in art galleries and museums that tell the past and present of the country.
 Further south are the Niagara falls and to the north you can see the natural beauty and untouched wilderness of the Muskoka region and so much more.
 All this and more makes Ontario typically Canadian in the opinions of foreigners.
 The wide areas more to the north are sparsely populated, among them some are almost uninhabited wildernesses.
 If you compare the population, the result may be surprising for many: in the United States, the number of African-American citizens is higher than that of Canadian citizens.
 The Islands of East Africa are situated in the Indian ocean, off the East Coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and its natural heritage makes it a continent in itself.
 Almost all the smaller Islands, noted as luxurious bathing resorts, are mostly independent nations or associated with France.
 In the lands, the Arabs brought Islam, which began a long journey to the Comoros and Mayotte.
 In the fifteenth century, the discovery of the Cape route, which went from Europe to India, by the Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama, opened the way to European influence and colonialism.
 To the north, the region is delimited by Sahel, while to the south and west it borders the Atlantic ocean.
 For travelers: it is recommended to all to declare that they are married, regardless of the actual civil status.
 It is useful also to wear a ring (but not one that looks too expensive).
 It is important that women realise that cultural differences can give rise to what they themselves consider to be a molestation, and that it is not unusual to be followed, grabbed by the arm, etc.
 Have the firmness to refuse men, and be not afraid to oppose them (cultural differences or not, there is no justification <Exclamationpoint>
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the tenth century a.C.; with the name of Anfa, it was a port of strategic importance used by the Phoenicians, the Romans, and the Merinides.
 The Portuguese destroyed it to rebuild it with the name of Casa Branca, which they abandoned in 1755 following an earthquake.
 The Moroccan Sultan rebuilt the city, which was called Daru l-Badya, then called Casablanca by the Spanish traders who chose these places for their commercial bases.
 In all of Morocco, Casablanca is one of the least interesting cities for shopping.
 In the old Medina, it's easy to find places that sell traditional Moroccan products, like tajin, ceramics, leather goods, narghilehs, and tons of chincaglierie, but all this is reserved only for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city located in the Eastern part of the Democratic Republic of Congo, not far from Rwanda.
 In 2002, lava from the Nyiragongo volcano destroyed Goma, burying much of the city's streets, especially those in the center.
 While Goma is reasonably safe, it is wise to document yourself well before making any visits outside of Goma, in order to assess the state of the clashes that still persist in the North Kivu province.
 The city is also the starting point for climbing Nyiragongo volcano, and is one of the least expensive opportunities to see the mountain gorillas of Africa.
 It is possible to use a boda-boda (taxi-motorcycle) to move around Goma. The normal price (in local currency) is about 500 Congolese francs for a short ride.
 Even in consequence of its relative inaccessibility, Timbuctoo has come to be a metaphor for exotic and remote land.
 Today Timbuktu is a decayed city, but for its reputation it remains a tourist attraction, with an airport.
 In 1990 it was included in the list of UNESCO world heritage sites that are in danger, because of the threat posed by desert sands.
 In the PBS special Henry Louis Gates's Wonders of the African World, it was one of the main stops.
 With its touch more Arab than African, the city stands out distinctly from the other cities of the country.
 The Kruger National Park is located in the northeast of South Africa and stretches east along the border with Mozambique, to the north it borders with Zimbabwe, and to the south it is represented by the Crocodile River.
 With a surface area of 19,500 km², the park comprises 14 ecozones, each of which supports a different wildlife.
 It is one of the main attractions of South Africa and is considered the most important of the South African National Parks.
 As with all national parks in South Africa, there are daily conservation and entrance fees.
 Even buying a Wildcard could be useful, as it allows access to a selection of parks in South Africa or to all South African National Parks.
 Hong Kong Island, which gives its name to the entire territory, represents for many tourists the main destination.
 The series of buildings that form Hong Kong's skyline has been compared to a scintillating bar graph, even more evident because framed by the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 To enjoy the best views of Hong Kong, abandon the island and visit the waterfront of Kowloon across.
 Most of Hong Kong's urban development has concentrated on the reclaimed land of the northern coast, densely populated.
 This is the place that the English colonizers chose for themselves, so if you're looking for evidence of the colonial past of this land, this is a good place to start.
 The Sundarbans are the largest Mangrove forest in the world, extending 80 km from the coast in the interior of Bangladesh and India.
 The Sundarbans were declared a UNESCO World Heritage Site in 1987.
 However, the forests are not only constituted by Mangrove swamps: in them, one finds also what remains of the imposing jungles that once covered the plain of the Ganges.
 Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 km², of which about one third is made up of swampy areas.
 Since 1966, the Sundarbans have become a sanctuary for wildlife, with an estimated 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer.
 Buses depart from the inter-district bus station (on the other side of the river) throughout the day, although many (especially those heading east and to Jakar/Bumthang) depart between 06:30 and 07:30.
 Since buses serving different districts are often full, it is best to buy the ticket a few days in advance.
 Most of the neighborhoods are reached by comfortable and robust little Japanese buses.
 Shared taxis are a convenient and fast way to reach nearby localities, including Paro (150 Nu) and Punakha (200 Nu).
 The bridge over the Oyapock River is a stressed concrete bridge that joins the city of Oiapoque, Brazil, to Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock, in French Guiana.
 Its two pylons are 83 meters high, it is 378 meters long and has two lanes 3.50 meters wide.
 Under the bridge, the free vertical space is 15 meters. The construction was completed in August 201, but the opening to traffic was only in March 2017.
 In September 2017, when Brazilian customs checkpoints are likely to be fully operational, the bridge should be totally functional.
 The Guaraní were the most important indigenous group living in the present-day Eastern Paraguay. They were hunter-gatherers and also practiced subsistence agriculture.
 The region of the Chaco was inhabited by other indigenous groups like the Guaycuru and the Payaguá, who lived by hunting, gathering and fishing.
 Paraguay, formerly called the great province of the Indies, was born in the sixteenth century from the encounter between Spanish conquerors and indigenous groups.
 The Spanish gave rise to a period that lasted three centuries, the period of colonization.
 Since the foundation of Asunción, in 1537, Paraguay has been able to maintain much of its identity and its autochtone peculiarities.
 Argentina has one of the best teams and players in the world.
 In December, in the Las Cañitas polo fields, the most important tournament of the year takes place.
 Here you can watch minor tournaments and matches even at other times of the year.
 For information on tournaments and the purchase of tickets for polo matches, please contact the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The Falkland Islands have their own official currency, the Falkland Islands pound, which is equivalent to the British pound sterling.
 The only bank in the Islands, situated in Stanley opposite the FIC West shop, offers currency exchange.
 British sterling is generally accepted everywhere on the Islands. Stanley often accepts U.S. dollars and credit cards.
 It is probable that on the outer Islands they will not accept credit cards, although British and U S . dollars may be accepted. Check in advance with the owners to decide on an acceptable method of payment.
 It's almost impossible to change the currency of the Falklands outside the Islands, so change your money before you leave.
 Since Montevideo is south of the equator, it is summer when in the northern hemisphere it is winter and vice versa.
 Montevideo is situated in the subtropical region, during the summer months temperatures over 30°C are quite normal.
 Winter can be deceptively cold: rarely do temperatures fall below freezing, but the combination of wind and humidity gives the sensation of a temperature lower than that indicated by the thermometer.
 There are no defined dry and rainy seasons: the amount of rain stays pretty much constant all year round.
 Although many of the park's animals are used to seeing humans, the fauna is still wild and should not be fed or disturbed.
 Authorities recommend maintaining a distance of at least 100 yards from bears and wolves and a distance of 25 yards from all other wild animals.
 No matter how docile they may seem, bison, elk, deer, bear, practically all large animals can attack.
 Every year, dozens of visitors sustain injuries for not maintaining adequate distance. It is necessary to leave these animals adequate space as they are large, wild and potentially dangerous animals.
 Keep in mind that odors can attract bears and other wild animals, so avoid bringing or cooking foods with very strong odors, and keep your camping area clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa, situated on the island of Upolu, and has a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded between 1850 and 1860 and is the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 In this port, the notorious naval standoff of 1889 took place, in which seven ships from Germany, the United States, and Britain refused to leave the port.
 All but one British cruiser were sunk, with nearly 200 American and German lives lost.
 In the course of the Mau movement's struggle for independence, a peaceful rally in the city led to the killing of Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III, the Supreme Chief.
 There are many beaches, as Auckland is situated between two harbours, the most popular being divided into three areas.
 The beaches facing the Pacific Ocean of the North Shore (in the North Harbour district) extend from Long Bay to the north to Devonport to the south.
 These beaches are mainly safe for swimming, and most of them enjoy the shade of the pohutukawa trees.
 The beaches of Tamaki Drive in Auckland central, in the elegant suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers, overlook Waitemata Harbour.
 These beaches are family-friendly, sometimes a bit crowded, surrounded by a wide choice of shops, and safe for swimming.
 The local beer most known is a non-complex, refreshing and pleasant beer called Number One. The other local beer is called Manta.
 You can have many French wines, but Australian and New Zealand wines could face the journey better.
 The water from the place's tap is totally safe to drink, but if you have any fears, bottled water is simple to find.
 According to Australians, the flat white coffee is born from a foreign idea. Espresso is the short, black coffee, cappuccino is covered in foam, not milk, and tea is served without milk.
 Hot chocolate is at the same level as Belgian chocolate. Fruit juices are expensive, but very good.
 Throughout the year, many excursions are made on the coral reef and injuries for one of these causes on the coral reef are rare.
 Always ask for advice from the authorities, follow instructions and pay particular attention to safety notices.
 Cubomedusae appear from October to April near beaches and estuaries of rivers north of Seventeen Seventy. Outside of this period they can only be found occasionally.
 Sharks are present, but rarely attack humans, most sharks are afraid of humans and tend to keep their distance.
 The habitat of saltwater crocodiles is mainly the estuaries of the rivers north of Rockhampton, not living actively in the ocean.
 By booking in advance, the traveler has the serenity of finding a place to sleep once he or she arrives at their destination.
 Travel agencies often have arrangements with certain hotels, but it is still possible to book other forms of accommodation, such as camping, through the same agencies.
 Travel agencies generally offer packages comprising breakfast, transfers to and from the airport or even combined flight and hotel packages.
 You can also hold the reservation for you if you need time to think about the offer or to procure additional documents necessary for your destination (e.g. visa).
 However, any changes or requests must be presented to the travel agent and not directly to the hotel.
 In the case of some musical festivals, most of the participants decide to camp on the spot, considering this aspect a crucial element of the experience.
 To be near the center of the action, it's necessary to arrive early and secure a space near the music.
 Remember that once the music is over on the main stages, there may be sections of the festival where the music goes on until late at night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you cross the Baltic Sea in winter, check the location of your cabin, as crossing the ice can cause quite a bit of noise for those who are more exposed.
 San Petersburg cruises include time to explore the city. Cruise passengers are granted exemption from the visa requirement.
 Generally, casinos do everything they can to increase the amount of time and money spent by their guests. Generally, there are neither windows nor clocks, and exits can be hard to find.
 Usually, they offer food, beverages and exclusive entertainment to keep the mood of the guests high and to keep them staying.
 In some locales, alcoholic beverages are offered by the house. However, the state of intoxication alters the capacity for judgment and every good gambler knows how important it is to remain sober.
 Whoever decides to drive at high altitudes or on mountain passes must consider the possibility of snow, ice or temperatures near to zero.
 On ice and snow, the friction is reduced and it is not possible to drive as when one is on clean asphalt.
 During a blizzard, in a very short time, so much snow can fall that you may be blocked.
 Even precipitation and winds, or the formation of ice or condensation on the vehicle's windows, can reduce visibility.
 However, ice and snow are normal conditions in many countries, and traffic continues to flow almost uninterruptedly throughout the year.
 Safaris are probably the largest tourist attraction in Africa and the fulcrum of many visitors' holiday.
 In its popular use, the term safari refers to trips taken via land, particularly in the savannah, to see the beautiful African wildlife.
 Some animals, like elephants and giraffes, tend to approach cars more, so a normal camera setup is sufficient to get a good view.
 Lions, cheetahs and leopards are sometimes timid and for this it is possible to observe them better with a binocular.
 A walking safari is a type of safari that can last a few hours or more days.
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2012, and part of the events will be held in other locations throughout Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two summer Olympic games, the first having been held in 1964.
 If your booking for flights and accommodation for 2020 was made before the postponement was announced, you may find yourself in a difficult situation.
 Cancelation policies vary, however, most of the cancellation policies linked to the Coronavirus, at the end of March 2020, do not arrive until July 2020, when the Olympics are scheduled.
 It's predicted that the cost of most tickets for events will be between 2,500 yuan and 130,000 yuan, while normal tickets will cost around 7,000 yuan.
 Stirring wet clothes can facilitate drying. Many hotels offer the use of an iron and ironing board, even if they are not in the room.
 If you do not have an iron, or if you do not like wearing ironed socks, you can try with a hair dryer, if you have one available.
 Paying attention to not to subject the tissues to too high temperatures, to avoid restraints or, in the worst case, burns.
 There are various ways to sanitize water, and some of these result in being more effective against specific risks.
 In certain zones it is sufficient to boil the water for a minute, in others many minutes are required.
 The effectiveness of filters is variable, so in case of doubts it is appropriate to evaluate the purchase of water packaged inside sealed bottles coming from a reliable company.
 Travellers can come into contact with animal parasites that are not found in their regions of origin.
 Parasites can spoil food, cause irritation or, in the worst case, cause allergic reactions, and transmit poison or infections.
 The same infectious diseases and dangerous animals that can injure or kill people with force are not usually qualified as dangerous animals.
 Duty-Free shopping is an opportunity to buy tax-free and duty-free products in certain locations.
 Travelers heading to countries with high taxes can sometimes save a lot, especially on products like alcohol and tobacco.
 The Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway between Point Marion and Fairmont is the one that presents the most difficult driving conditions, as it often traverses isolated areas between the vegetation.
 If you're not used to driving on country roads, it's advisable to keep your eyes well open, as steep gradients, narrow lanes and tight curves predominate.
 The speed limits displayed are decidedly lower than those applied in the previous and subsequent sections (normally 35-40 mph / 56-64 km/h). Their rigorous observance is extremely important.
 Strangely, though, in this zone the level of mobile phone service coverage is much higher than in other stretches of the route, for example in the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German desserts are quite good and in Bavaria are quite savory and varied, similar to those of nearby Austria to the south.
 Fruit desserts are a timeless classic, from apples with year-round availability to cherries and plums that make their appearance during the summer.
 Several German cakes contain almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts, and the most popular cakes are often accompanied by a cup of strong coffee.
 Those who desire to taste small but rich in flavor cakes, can orient themselves on those that, depending on the region, are called Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen.
 Curry is a dish prepared with herbs and spices, combined with meat or vegetables.
 Curry can be presented either as a dry or a wet dish, depending on the amount of liquid contained.
 In northern India and Pakistan for curry in the regions of the interior, yogurt is normally used, in southern India and some other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is more commonly used.
 Given the presence of 17,000 Islands to choose from, the term Indonesian cuisine is a generic term that covers a wide variety of regional cuisines found in the country.
 However, when used without further specifications, the term generally indicates foods originating in the central and eastern part of the main island, Java.
 The cuisine of Java, now amply diffused throughout the archipelago, offers a series of dishes of simple preparation, its predominant flavors being given by the use of peanuts, chili peppers, sugar (especially the Java sugar) and various aromatic spices.
 The stirrups are foot supports for the rider and are attached to the two sides of the saddle.
 They guarantee greater stability to the rider but may present safety problems for the possibility that the rider's feet may become stuck.
 If a jockey is thrown off a horse but has a foot stuck in the stirrup, he could be dragged along by the horse as it runs away.
 First, most of the knights wear riding boots with a heel and a smooth, rather thin sole.
 In later saddles, especially English ones, some bars of security were inserted, which made it so that a leather strap would detach itself from the saddle when, in case of a fall, the rider pulled it back.
 Cochamó Valley: the most important destination for climbing in Chile, known as Yosemite of the South America, where there are a great number of enormous granite walls and cliffs.
 The peaks of the mountains include breathtaking panoramas, and climbers from every part of the world continually trace new routes on its walls, potentially infinite.
 Sports on snow, like skiing and snowboarding, are very popular and involve sliding on snow using skis or a snowboard attached to the feet.
 Skiing is one of the principal tourist activities and boasts many passionate, sometimes even defined ski bums, who dedicate entire periods of vacation to skiing in a particular skiing area.
 The principle behind skiing is very old: the first paintings of humans skiing date back to 5000 BC.
 Skiing as a sport has its origins at least in the seventeenth century, when the first recreational ski club in Australia was opened by the Norwegians in 1861.
 Ski touring, also called backcountry skiing, is called also off-piste, ski alpinism or ski touring.
 It is linked, although usually not comprised, to ski touring or skimo, which are practiced on steep terrain and require much stiffer skis and boots.
 Think of the ski slope as a similar trail.
 If the conditions are good, you can cover distances in some way greater than those covered by walking, but only very rarely will you reach the speeds of cross-country skiing without a heavy pack on beaten tracks.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but made up of many independent countries. Normally, to travel through more than one country, you would need to apply for a visa and pass through passport control more than once.
 Nevertheless, on this aspect, Schengen space functions more as a single country.
 If you remain within this area, normally it is possible to go from one border to the other without having to pass through passport controls again.
 At the same time, if you have a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for visas for the individual Member States, saving you time, money and bureaucracy.
 There is no universal definition of what makes an item an antique, some tax agencies consider an item to be an antique if it is at least 100 years old.
 The definition presents geographic differences, as in the case of North America versus Europe.
 Craftsman-made items could be defined as antiques, even though they are more recent than similar mass-produced items.
 Reindeer herding is an important source of livelihood for the Sámi, and the culture upon which this trade is based is also the foundation of many other professions.
 Even in the course of time, not always all Sámi were involved in large-scale reindeer herding, some lived of fishing, hunting and similar activities, using reindeer mostly as work animals.
 Today many Sámi people work in modern professions, tourism being an important source of income in the Sápmi, the territory of the Sámi.
 Even though it is very used, in particular among non-Rom people, the word Zingaro is often considered offensive because it is associated with negative stereotypes and a misperception of the Roma.
 If a travel warning is issued for the destination you're visiting, there could be consequences on your travel insurance or your cancellation insurance.
 You may also be interested in the views of governments other than your own, but keep in mind that these views are aimed at the citizens of those governments.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may encounter situations different from Europeans or Arabs.
 The notices simply constitute a brief summary of the political situation of a country.
 Opinions reported are often superficial, general and simplistic compared to the more detailed information available elsewhere.
 Weather warnings are the general expression used to indicate any dangerous meteorological phenomenon that can cause damage, serious social disruption or loss of human life.
 In every part of the world, extreme weather can occur, and there are different types, depending on geography, topography, and atmospheric conditions.
 Strong winds, hail, precipitation above the norm and uncontrolled fires are manifestations and consequences of adverse meteorological conditions, analogously to thunderstorms, tornadoes, marine trumpets and cyclones.
 Among the regional and seasonal severe weather phenomena are thunderstorms, blizzards, ice storms, and sandstorms.
 Travelers are recommended to inform themselves about adverse weather conditions that affect their zone, as they could influence the planning of the trip.
 Anyone planning to visit a potentially war zone should undertake professional training.
 By searching on the Internet for 'Course on hostile environments', you are likely to find the address of a local company.
 A course will normally treat all the questions discussed here in much more detail, usually by availing itself of practical experience.
 A course normally lasts from 2 to 5 days and includes role-playing games, as well as many first aid and sometimes weapons training activities.
 Books and magazines dealing with survival in nature are widespread, while there are few publications dealing with war zones.
 Travellers who have planned a surgery to change sex overseas must make sure they have valid documents for the return journey.
 The intention by governments to issue passports without indications of sex (X) or updated documents to match a desired name and gender is variable.
 Other than that, the availability of foreign governments to accept such documents is variable.
 Even inspections at security checks have become much more scrupulous in the era post 11 September 2001.
 Transgender people in pre-operative phase should not expect to pass the controls without their privacy and dignity being intact.
 The currents of the rip tide are constituted by the return flow of the waves that break on the beach, often near a coral reef or similar formation.
 Viewed the Sub-Marine topology, the return flow concentrates in some deeper sections where it can form a strong current towards the open sea.
 Most deaths occur as a result of exhaustion in the attempt to swim against the current, which can be impossible.
 As soon as you are out of the current, returning to swim will not be as difficult as normal.
 Try to identify an area where you are not likely to be trapped again, or evaluate if you should wait for rescue based on your skills and if you have been spotted.
 The shock from reentry is manifested in a shorter time than the cultural shock (since there is a reduced honeymoon phase), lasts longer and can be more serious.
 Travelers who have found it easy to adapt to the new culture sometimes have difficulty readapting to the culture of their own country.
 When you return home after living abroad, you will have adapted to the new culture and you will have lost some of the usages of your culture of origin.
 In the first experience abroad, it's likely that you encountered people who were patient and understanding, aware that travelers in a new place need to adapt.
 Many people did not imagine patience and awareness were necessary even for those returning home.
 The pyramid's show of lights and sounds is one of the most interesting things for children in the area.
 Before the start of the show, it will be possible to admire the pyramids immersed in darkness and silence.
 Normally, you always hear the noise caused by tourists and vendors. The show of sounds and lights is just like a book of stories.
 The Sphinx becomes the background and narrator of a long tale.
 The scenes are projected onto the pyramids and each pyramid is illuminated.
 Claimed by various countries, the Southern Shetland Islands, discovered in 1819, have the highest number of bases, of which sixteen were active in 2020.
 The archipelago is 120 km north of the peninsula. King George Island is the largest and is home to the town of Villa Las Estrellas.
 Among other Islands are Livingston Island and Deception Island, in the latter of which the caldera of a still active volcano has been filled with water, forming a magnificent natural harbor.
 Ellsworth land is the region that lies south of the peninsula and faces the Bellingshausen sea.
 Here the mountains of the peninsula merge into the high plateau, then re-emerge to form the Ellsworth mountains, a chain of 360 km cut in two by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern part, known as the Sentinel Range, boasts the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, which reaches 4,892 m with Mount Vinson.
 In remote areas, where cell phone coverage is not available, a satellite phone may be the only alternative.
 A satellite phone is not generally a substitute for a cell phone, because to call one must be outdoors with a clear view to the satellite.
 The service is often used by pleasure craft, including those for pleasure, as well as by missions that have a need for data and voice at a distance.
 Your local telephone service provider should be able to provide you with more information about connecting to this service.
 One of the options that is becoming more and more popular among those who are planning to take a gap year is to travel and learn.
 It's particularly widespread among neodiplomates, since they can take a year off before starting university without compromising their education.
 In many cases, enrolling in a course abroad in the sabbatical year can actually increase the chances of returning to higher education upon return to one's home country.
 Usually, enrolling in these educational programs requires the payment of a fee.
 Finland is the ideal destination for those who love to sail. In the land of a thousand lakes there are also thousands of islands, within the lakes and in the coastal archipelagos.
 It's not alone though, experimentation, and an experiment is a test that is used to eliminate one or more of the possible hypotheses, asking questions, and making observations also guide scientific research.
 Even though the archipelagos and the larger lakes are certainly large enough for any yacht, the smaller boats or even a kayak offer a different experience.
 The nautical sport of Finland is boating, where there is one boat for every seven or eight people.
 This happens also in Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but in general it is a rather singular fact (e.g. in the Netherlands the ratio is one to forty).
 Most Baltic cruises include a multi-day stay in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 This means that it is possible to visit the historic town for two whole days, returning on the ship in the evening to sleep.
 For disembarkation no separate visa will be necessary using the excursions of board.
 Some brochures also propose cruises to Berlin, Germany. As you can see from the map above, Berlin is not near the sea, and the visit to the city is not included in the cruise price.
 Flying can be scary for people of all ages and conditions, especially if they have never flown before or have had some traumatic experience.
 There is nothing to be ashamed of: it is not unlike the fears and aversions personal to many people in their dealings with other things.
 For some people, understanding a bit about how airplanes work and what happens during a flight can be helpful in overcoming a fear based on what is unknown or a lack of control.
 The couriers are well paid to deliver products quickly. Often, timing is very important in the case of business documents, goods or parts for an urgent repair.
 For some routes, the larger companies used their own aircraft, but for other routes and in the case of smaller companies, problems emerged.
 On some routes, air shipments would have taken days for unloading and customs.
 The only way to get it there faster would be to ship it as baggage, and that's where you come in, since airline regulations don't allow baggage to be shipped without a passenger.
 To fly in first class or business class, the most obvious way is to pay a lot of money for the privilege, or, even better, convince your company to do it.
 However, the price to pay is high: indicatively, you can expect to pay up to four times the normal economy fare for Business and up to eleven times the normal fare for First Class travels.
 In general, on direct flights from A to B, it's not even worth trying to find deals on first or business class seats.
 Airlines know that there is a category of travelers who are willing to pay a lot of money for the privilege of arriving quickly and comfortably at their destination, and as a result, they apply certain tariffs.
 The capital of Moldova is Chişinău and the local language is Romanian, although Russian is also very widespread.
 Moldova is a Multi-Ethnic Republic that has been the scene of ethnic conflict in the past.
 In 1994, the conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Transnistria Republic in the eastern part of Moldavia, with its own government and currency, but not recognized by any UN member state.
 Despite the failure of political negotiations, economic relations between these two zones of Moldavia have been restored.
 The predominant religion in Moldavia is Christian Orthodoxy.
 Smirne is the third city of Turkey in size, with a population of about 3.7 million, and is the second largest port after Istanbul and an important transportation hub.
 The ancient city of Smirne is developed on a huge bay, is surrounded by mountains and currently constitutes a modern, evolved and active commercial center.
 Although the city breathes a more Mediterranean atmosphere than that of traditional Turkey, wide boulevards, glass facades and modern shopping centers are dotted with characteristic red-tiled roofs, the eighteenth century market and ancient mosques and churches.
 In the village of Haldarsvik you can enjoy beautiful views over the nearby island of Eysturoy and you can visit a singular octagonal church.
 In the churchyard, on some of the tombs, are present some interesting marble sculptures of doves.
 A half hour is sufficient to walk the enchanting village.
 To the north is the romantic and enchanting city of Sintra, easily reached, which became famous in the eyes of foreigners thanks to the brilliant tale of its splendors written by Lord Byron.
 The Scotturb 403 bus line regularly connects with Sintra, and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 Always to the north, visit the great sanctuary of the Madonna of Fatima, a place of Marian apparitions celebrated throughout the world.
 Remember that the site you are visiting is basically a common grave, and has a meaning pretty much incalculable to a large part of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women survivors of these places, and many others who have seen their own relatives murdered or worked to death, both Jewish and non-Jewish.
 Treat the place with all the dignity, seriousness, and respect it deserves. Avoid jokes about the holocaust or Nazis.
 Avoid defacing these places by graffitiing or marking the structures.
 In the city of Barcelona, the official languages are Catalan and Spanish. Approximately half of the population prefers to speak Catalan, and the vast majority is able to understand it.
 However, most of the signs are written exclusively in Catalan, which is the first official language by law.
 Spanish, however, is widely used for public transport and other services.
 In the Metro, ordinary announcements are only in Catalan, and any unscheduled service interruptions are communicated in a wide variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese, thanks to an automatic system.
 Parisians have a reputation for being egocentric, rude and arrogant.
 Even if often it's just an imprecise stereotype, the best way to feel at home in Paris continues to be to behave as a well-educated person would, making yourself as easy as possible.
 The rude exterior of the Parisians will vanish quickly if you show some basic good manners.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is rich in forests, mainly beech, fir and spruce, and is characterized by a mixed alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 Thanks to a multiplicity of microclimates, soils and levels of altitude, it presents a great variety of vegetable communities.
 The area also hosts a great variety of animal and bird species.
 In these places live rare species like the European Brown bear, the wolf, the Eagle, the Owl, the Lynx, the wild cat and the Cedar-Waxwing, alongside several other animal species more widely diffused.
 When visiting monasteries, women are required to wear skirts that cover their knees and to cover their shoulders.
 Most monasteries provide stoles for women who arrive unprepared, but if you have one already, especially if it's a vivid color, you'll earn a smile from the monk or nun at the entrance.
 In a similar way, men are required to wear long pants down to the knees.
 These can also be borrowed from the store at the entrance, however, the clothes are not washed after each user, so wearing these skirts you may not feel comfortable.
 Majorcan cuisine, like that of similar zones of the Mediterranean, is based on bread, vegetables and meat (especially pork) and uses olive oil everywhere.
 Pa amb Oli is a simple, popular summer meal: bread with olive oil, tomato, and all the condiments available, such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 All nouns, in addition to the pronoun Sie used for the formal you, begin with a capital letter, even if they appear in the middle of a sentence.
 This represents an important mechanism for distinguishing certain verbs and complements.
 This aspect probably also facilitates reading, although the need to understand whether a verb or an adjective is used in a substantivated form makes the writing rather complex.
 Italian pronunciation is relatively simple since most words are pronounced the same way they are spelled.
 The main letters to pay attention to are the c and the g, since their pronunciation changes based on the vowel that follows.
 Assure yourself that you pronounce the r and the rr differently: caro means dear, while carro means car.
 Persian possesses a relatively simple and most of the time regular grammar.
 So, reading this basic grammar manual could help you a lot with Persian grammar and in understanding phrases.
 It goes without saying that if you already know a Romance language, learning Portuguese will be easier.
 However, people with a minimal knowledge of Spanish may come to the precipitous conclusion that Portuguese is quite similar and therefore need not be studied separately.
 Usually, pre-modern observers result obsolete and function as museums or educational places.
 Since light pollution in their heyday did not represent a problem as it is today, they are usually located in cities or on campuses, more easily reached than those built in modern times.
 Most modern telescopes destined for research are enormous structures in remote areas where the atmospheric conditions are favorable.
 The admiration of the cherry blossom, known as hanami, has been part of Japanese culture since the eighth century.
 The concept originated in China, where the flowering of plum trees was preferred.
 In Japan, the first festivals for the plum blossom were organized by the emperor for himself and other members of the aristocracy close to the Imperial court.
 Plants give their best when they are in their natural environment, so resist the temptation to take even just one plant.
 If you visit an Italian garden, even picking a few plants will cost you an Allontanamento, or removal, from the premises, without discussion.
 In general, Singapore is a very safe and easy city to get around in, and you can buy practically anything once you arrive.
 But being in the high tropics, only a few degrees north of the equator, you'll have to contend with the heat and the strong sun more often than not.
 Some buses also head north, to Hebron, the traditional place where the Biblical patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, Jacob and their wives were buried.
 Ensure that the bus you want to take reaches the interior of Hebron and does not stop at the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 Rivers in the interior can be a great theme around which to organize a vacation.
 For example, you can visit the castles in the Loire Valley and the Rhine Valley, you can take a cruise to visit the interesting cities on the Danube, or you can navigate on the Erie Canal.
 They also define the routes of hiking trails and bicycle paths that are very well known.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays in Christianity and celebrates the birth of Jesus.
 Historically, most farmers were engaged in subsistence agriculture, and this is still the case in many developing nations.
 A tradition provides for spending the Easter night awake in an open place to be able to admire the dawn.
 There are, of course, religious explanations for this tradition, but it could just as well be a pre-Christian rite linked to spring and fertility.
 In the more traditional churches, a Paschal vigil is often held on the Saturday night of the Easter weekend, with congregations often beginning the ceremony at midnight to celebrate the resurrection of Christ.
 All animals that originally arrived on the Islands arrived by swimming, flying or floating.
 Since the distance from the mainland was considerable, mammals could not make the journey, and this has made the giant tortoise the main grazing animal in the Galapagos.
 At the Galapagos, numerous mammals like goats, horses, cows, rats, dogs and cats were introduced after the arrival of man.
 If you visit the territories of the Arctic or Antarctic during the winter, you will be able to experience the polar night, when the sun remains below the horizon.
 This phenomenon offers the possibility of witnessing the Aurora Borealis, because the sky remains dark almost all day.
 Since the territories are sparsely populated, light pollution is often not a problem and you can even enjoy the stars.
 In Japan, the culture of work is more hierarchical and formal than that to which Westerners tend to be accustomed.
 Office attire normally consists of a jacket and tie or tuxedo and one addresses colleagues by their first name or professional title.
 It is of crucial importance that the harmony of the workplace, since it gives importance to the group's effort rather than to individual achievements.
 Workers often have to receive the approval of their superiors in regard to every decision, and are expected to follow instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.28645143837144527, 'precisions': [0.6105148967494479, 0.3500141134723174, 0.22100306890318241, 0.14256860592755213], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.0440920674729988, 'translation_length': 25811, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 58.599828837604285, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}